South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3309.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Energy Security Act." SECTION 2.  Section 58-3-140 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-3-140.  (A) Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 9 of this title, the commission is vested with power and jurisdiction to supervise and regulate the rates and service of every public utility in this State and to fix just and reasonable standards, classifications, regulations, practices, and measurements of service to be furnished, imposed, or observed, and followed by every public utility in this State. (B) The commission must develop and publish a policy manual which must set forth guidelines for the administration of the commission. All procedures must incorporate state requirements and good management practices to ensure the efficient and economical utilization of resources. (C) The commission must facilitate access to its general rate request orders in contested matters involving more than one hundred thousand dollars by publishing an order guide which indexes and cross-references orders by subject matter and case name. The order guide must be made available for public inspection. (D) The commission must promulgate regulations to require the direct testimony of witnesses appearing on behalf of utilities and of witnesses appearing on behalf of persons having formal intervenor status, such testimony to be reduced to writing and prefiled with the commission in advance of any hearing. In contested case proceedings, the applicant seeking relief from the commission shall have the right to prefile rebuttal testimony responsive to the direct prefiled testimony of other parties. The commission may allow supplemental testimony in cases where new matters arise after the filing of direct testimony, provided that parties shall have the right to respond to such supplemental testimony. The procedural schedule for each contested case proceeding shall include dates for completion of each phase of discovery, including discovery related to the application or other initial pleading as filed, direct testimony of the applicant, direct testimony of the Office of Regulatory Staff and other parties and intervenors, rebuttal testimony of the applicant, and surrebuttal testimony. Except upon showing of exceptional circumstances or surprise, all discovery must be completed not less than ten days prior to the hearing. The party with the burden of proof must be permitted to open and close its case, including the presentation of responsive witness testimony. (E) The commission may convene public hearings to allow public utility customers to address the commission as public witnesses without intervening in the proceedings and without subjecting themselves to discovery or prefiling testimony. Public witnesses may address the commission on issues related to customer service, utility operations, reliability, economic hardship, affordability, environmental concerns, or other matters that affect them. The public utility and the Office of Regulatory Staff shall work to investigate and resolve individual service issues raised by public witnesses. (F) Any other provision of law notwithstanding, to the extent the commission is authorized by the General Assembly to employ an independent third-party consultant to assist the commission in its duties with respect to a matter before the commission, such consultant may only rely upon evidence introduced by a party to that proceeding into the record subject to the requirements of the South Carolina Administrative Procedures Act. Further, the commission may not give any consultant employed by the commission party status in a proceeding before the commission. (E)(G) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to repeal or modify specific exclusions from the commission's jurisdiction pursuant to Title 58 or any other title. (F)(H) When required to be filed, tariffs must be filed with the office of the chief clerk of the commission and, on that same day, provided to the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff. SECTION 3.  Section 58-3-250(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) A copy of every final order or decision under the seal of the commission must be served by electronic service, or registered or certified mail, upon all parties to the proceeding or their attorneys. Service of every final order or decision upon a party or upon the attorney must be made by emailing a copy of the order to the party's email address provided to the commission or by mailing a copy to the party's last known address. If no email or other address is known, however, service shall be made by leaving a copy with the chief clerk of the commission. The order takes effect and becomes operative when served unless otherwise designated and continues in force either for a period designated by the commission or until changed or revoked by the commission. If, in the judgment of the commission, an order cannot be complied with within the time designated, the commission may grant and prescribe additional time as is reasonably necessary to comply with the order and, on application and for good cause shown, may extend the time for compliance fixed in its order. SECTION 4.  Section 58-4-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-4-10. (A) There is hereby created the Office of Regulatory Staff as a separate agency of the State with the duties and organizations as hereinafter provided. (B) Unless and until it chooses not to participate, the Office of Regulatory Staff must be considered a party of record in all filings, applications, or proceedings before the commission. The regulatory staff must represent the public interest of South Carolina before the commission as it pertains to the matters below:. For purposes of this chapter only, "public interest" means (1) the concerns of the using and consuming public with respect to public utility services, regardless of the class of customer,; and and (2) preservation of the of continued investment in and maintenance of utility facilities so as to provide reliable and high quality utility services. (C) The Office of Regulatory Staff is subject to the provision of Section 58-3-260 prohibiting ex parte communications with the commission, and any advice given to the commission by the regulatory staff must be given in a form, forum, and manner as may lawfully be given by any other party or person. SECTION 5.  Chapter 4, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-4-150.  (A) To further advance and expand upon Executive Order 2023-18 which established the PowerSC Energy Resources and Economic Development Interagency Working Group, the Office of Regulatory Staff, in consultation with a stakeholder group that includes representatives of consumer, environmental, manufacturing, forestry, and agricultural organizations, natural gas and electrical utilities, the South Carolina Public Service Authority, and other affected state agencies, shall prepare a comprehensive South Carolina energy assessment and action plan, hereinafter referred to as "the plan." This plan must identify recommended actions over a ten-year period to ensure the availability of adequate, reliable, and economical supply of electric power and natural gas to the people and economy of South Carolina. For purposes of this section, natural gas and electrical utilities also includes any investor-owned electrical utility, a public utility as defined in Section 58-5-10, electric cooperatives, and any consolidated political subdivision that owns or operates in this State equipment or facilities for generating, transmitting, delivering, or furnishing electricity, but does not include an entity that furnishes electricity only to itself, its residents, or tenants when such current is not resold or used by others. (B) The Office of Regulatory Staff, in collaboration with the electrical utilities and the South Carolina Public Service Authority, shall aggregate data and analyses from their most recent integrated resource plans approved by the commission, and include any updates or associated filings and other available data in order to create a statewide comprehensive view of the availability of an adequate, reliable, and economical supply of energy resources to the people and economy of South Carolina. (C) The plan must detail factors, and make recommendations, essential to adequate, reliable, and economical supply of energy resources for the people and economy of South Carolina, including but not limited to: (1) projections of energy consumption in South Carolina, including the use of fuel resources and costs of electricity and generation resources across the electrical utilities' and the South Carolina Public Service Authority's balancing authority areas used to serve the State; (2) the adequacy of electricity generation, transmission, and distribution resources in this State to meet projections of energy consumption; (3) the adequacy of infrastructure utilized by natural gas industries in providing fuel supply to electric generation plants or otherwise for end-use customers; (4) the overall needs of the South Carolina electric grid and transmission system and details from the plans of each electrical utility and the South Carolina Public Service Authority to meet current and future energy needs in a cost-effective, reliable, economic, and environmental manner; (5) an assessment of state and local impediments to expanded use of generation or distributed resources and recommendations to reduce or eliminate such impediments; (6) how energy efficiency, demand-side management programs, and conservation initiatives across the electrical utilities' and the South Carolina Public Service Authority's balancing authority areas may be expanded to lower bills and reduce electric consumption; (7) details regarding potential siting of energy resource and transmission facilities in order to identify any disproportionate adverse impact of such activities on the environment, agricultural community, land use, and economically disadvantaged or minority communities; (8) details regarding commercial and industrial consumer clean energy goals and options available to such customers to achieve these goals, including: (a) an analysis of the barriers commercial and industrial consumers face in making such investments in this State; (b) an analysis of any electric and natural gas regulatory barriers to the recruitment and retention of commercial and industrial customers in this State; and (c) recommendations to address any barriers identified in items (a) and (b) in a manner that is consistent with the public interest and which is not duly impactful to nonparticipating customers as it pertains to rate and system impacts, and which is not unduly impactful to entities providing public utility services; and (9) an analysis of the potential for the South Carolina Public Service Authority and the state's electric utilities to construct generation facilities utilizing domestic wood products from South Carolina as a primary or auxiliary fuel source. (D) In preparing the plan the Office of Regulatory Staff may retain an outside expert to assist with compiling this report. (E) In addition to the information required by this section, the plan must include recommendations for legislative, regulatory, or other public and private actions to best ensure a reliable and reasonably priced energy supply in South Carolina that supports the continued growth and success of this State. In forming these recommendations, the Office of Regulatory Staff must confer with the stakeholder group to ensure the recommendations would likely achieve the intended result for the electric grid, electric generation, and natural gas resources serving South Carolina customers. (F) The plan must be submitted to the Public Utilities Review Committee for approval. (G) The provisions of this section are subject to funding. SECTION 6.  Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 38 South Carolina Energy Policy Institute Section 58-38-10.  This chapter is known as and may be cited as the "South Carolina Energy Policy Research and Economic Development Institute" or "EPI." Section 58-38-20.  The General Assembly finds that: (1) It is in the public interest of South Carolina to establish an Energy Policy Research and Economic Development Institute, also referred to as EPI, to research and propose solutions to address major challenges in the complex and evolving area of energy generation and storage. (2) Research and documenting reliable data is essential for thoughtful consideration of the complex issues and concerns impacting energy generation and storage and the need for timely, substantive, and thorough advice from the EPI to the South Carolina General Assembly is critical to continue to position this State as a global leader. (3) The EPI shall collaborate across South Carolina in coordination with energy utility providers, private industry, workforce development, and the Governor's Nuclear Advisory Council to deliver advice on policy creation aligned with the state's distinctive needs and opportunities. (4) The EPI shall collaborate with the Energy Center at Clemson University to identify research funding opportunities to meet the urgent needs for energy technology innovation in South Carolina, develop curriculum to ensure relevant academic programming for the future jobs and leadership roles in the new energy industry, provide energy-related training programs to meet the increasing demand for skilled workers in the new energy industry, and promote technology innovation, translational research, and rapid technology transfer from research labs to industry. Section 58-38-30.  (A) The EPI shall be established by the University of South Carolina to serve as an expert and reliable advisory resource for state policymakers, government, and industry. This institute shall bring together a coalition of experts from various domains within the energy ecosystem, individuals and organizations specializing in innovating public policy approaches, as well as specialists from across higher education, including but not limited to, the University of South Carolina, Clemson University, and South Carolina State University. The EPI shall aid South Carolina in developing a strategic long-term approach to address energy-related challenges and economic development opportunities for the State of South Carolina. (B) The EPI shall be governed by a board of six members which shall provide oversight and guidance to the EPI. This board shall be composed of: (1) Speaker of the House of Representatives or his designee; (2) President of the Senate or his designee; (3) Chairman of the Ways and Means Committee of the House of Representatives, or his designee; (4) Chairman of the Finance Committee of the Senate or his designee; (5) Chairman of the Labor, Commerce and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives or his designee; and (6) Chairman of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate or his designee. (C) No former or current member of the General Assembly or their family members, or former or current employee of the South Carolina House of Representatives or the South Carolina Senate, can be an employee or a contractor of the EPI. Section 58-38-40. (A) The EPI shall prepare concise and informative documents that outline the key energy policy issues in South Carolina for members of the South Carolina General Assembly. These briefs shall offer evidence-based recommendations and their potential impacts to assist the legislature in decision making. (B) The EPI shall provide in-depth research on various aspects of energy policy relevant to South Carolina, at the direction of the board. (C) The EPI shall evaluate the economic implications of different energy policy options, including the potential costs and benefits to the state's economy, job market, industry competitiveness, and underdeveloped communities. (D) The EPI shall develop practical framework recommendations for implementing energy policies in South Carolina, considering regulatory mechanisms, enforcement mechanisms, and coordination between different government agencies. These frameworks must address potential challenges and propose strategies for successful implementation. (E) The EPI may host fellowships by which entities could offer the time and services of employees by which the EPI could leverage the knowledge, experience, and participation of such entities. SECTION 7.  Article 3, Chapter 33, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-33-195. (A) The General Assembly encourages Dominion Energy South Carolina, Inc. and the Public Service Authority to jointly complete evaluations related to construction of a joint resource or joint resources to address energy needs and advance the economy and general welfare of the State. If the entities pursue permitting and construction of a joint resource or joint resources, the entities are further encouraged to use existing rights of way to the greatest extent practicable. (B) The General Assembly hereby encourages Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC to complete evaluations for expanding energy storage, including hydro pumped storage, and energy generation opportunities in South Carolina. (C) The General Assembly hereby encourages Duke Energy Carolinas, LLC and Duke Energy Progress, LLC to complete evaluations for constructing hydrogen capable natural gas generation or otherwise to place into service such natural gas generation within the utilities' balancing areas serving South Carolina. (D) The General Assembly encourages the Public Service Authority and the state's electric utilities to complete evaluations for constructing generation facilities utilizing domestic wood products from South Carolina as a primary or auxiliary fuel source. (E)(1) In the event any of the projects described in subsections (A), (B), or (C) are approved, the Office of Regulatory Staff, using its authority provided in Title 58, must continuously monitor the project or projects. This includes, but is not limited to, a review of the construction in progress, such as meeting projected timelines and financial projections are met. The Office of Regulatory Staff must provide monthly updates, in writing, to the commission and to the members of the General Assembly. Each electrical utility and the Public Service Authority must cooperate to the fullest extent with the Office of Regulatory Staff. (2) The commission may, on its own motion, schedule a hearing to address concerns raised by the Office of Regulatory Staff in its written monthly review to the commission. (3) The commission shall consider the Office of Regulatory Staff's written monthly reviews in any future matters concerning any facility described in this section. SECTION 8.  Article 1, Chapter 31, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-31-205. (A) The Public Service Authority shall have the power to jointly own, as tenants-in-common or through a limited liability company, with Dominion Energy South Carolina, Inc., one or more natural gas-fired generation facilities, and related transmission facilities, to be constructed on a site at or near Dominion Energy South Carolina, Inc.'s former Canadys coal-fired generation station in Colleton County, the power to plan, finance, acquire, own, operate, and maintain an interest in such plants and facilities necessary or incidental to the generation and transmission of electric power and the power to make plans and enter into such contracts as are necessary or convenient for the planning, financing, acquisition, construction, ownership, operation, and maintenance of such plants and facilities. However, the Public Service Authority shall own a percentage of such plants and facilities equal to the percentage of the money furnished or the value of property supplied by the Public Service Authority for the acquisition and construction of the plants and facilities. The Public Service Authority shall also own and control a like percentage of the electrical output thereof. (B) The Public Service Authority shall be severally liable in proportion to its ownership share of such plants and facilities acquired pursuant to this section for the acts, omissions, or obligations performed, omitted, or incurred by the operator or other owners of the plants and facilities while acting as the designated agent of the Public Service Authority for the purposes of constructing, operating, or maintaining the plants and facilities, or any of them. However, the Public Service Authority shall not be otherwise liable, jointly or severally, for the acts, omissions, or obligations of other owners of the plants and facilities, nor shall any money or property of the Public Service Authority be credited or otherwise applied to the account of the operator or other owners of the plants and facilities, or be charged with any debt, lien, or mortgage as a result of any debt or obligation of the operator or other owners of the plants and facilities. SECTION 9.A.  Chapter 29, Title 6 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 6-29-1220. (A) For any county that has not adopted rural zoning or has not adopted ordinances establishing design and development standards for solar energy systems, and until such time as rural zoning or an ordinance for solar energy systems has been adopted, then the development and operation of solar energy systems that require a footprint of more than thirteen acres of land shall comply with the following design and development standards: (1) Site plans shall be prepared by a licensed land surveyor, landscape architect, or engineer in the State of South Carolina. Plans must be sealed. (2) Solar energy systems shall be set back fifty feet from adjoining property lines and road right of ways and two hundred feet from the nearest residence, church, or school. Setback distances are to the fence and are inclusive of the vegetation buffer. (3) Solar structures shall not exceed fifteen feet in height. This provision shall not include the interconnection poles, substation equipment, or other devices necessary for the electricity to be delivered to the public utility station. (4) Solar energy facilities shall be screened from adjacent public road rights-of-way, residences, churches, or schools with a vegetative buffer and fence or wall with the following specifications: (a) a vegetative buffer shall be installed adjacent to the solar energy system farm; (b) the vegetation shall be planted in two staggered rows at a spacing interval between eight feet and ten feet on center and reach at least six feet in height over a three-year growing season and not less than fifteen feet in height at maturity or two feet higher than the highest panel, whichever is greater; and (c) the vegetation shall include low lying vegetation to fill gaps between taller vegetation. (5) All lighting shall be shielded or directed in a downward position to prevent noxious glare. A light fixture is required at the ends of all turnarounds. (6) Fencing shall be at least six feet in height to secure the perimeter. The fence shall be secure at all times. (7) A warning sign concerning voltage must be placed at the main gate to include the address and name of the solar energy system operator and a twenty-four-hour phone number for the solar energy system in case of an emergency. (8) Solar collectors shall be designed with anti-reflective coating to minimize glare. Textured glass is optional. Mirrors are prohibited. (9) Submit and maintain an updated facility decommission plan consistent with the then current decommissioning requirements as required by the South Carolina Department of Environmental Services. (B) Upon receipt of a completed solar energy system plan by a county subject to the provisions in (A), the county shall set a date for a public hearing and send, by first class mail, a notice of the application to all property owners within two thousand six hundred and forty feet of the proposed solar energy system. The notification shall include projected date of the public hearing to be held by the county. Public notification includes posting in the local newspaper and mail notice to residents postmarked at least thirty days prior to the public hearing. (C) The Department of Environmental Services is charged with the enforcement of the provisions of this section. Upon the failure of the owner or operator that is given notice of violation of this section to remedy the violation within thirty days, the Department of Environmental Services may impose civil penalties and require remediation for violations of the provisions of this section. Penalties may be not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars for each day of noncompliance. Penalties may be waived by the Department for good cause for noncompliance shown by the owner or operator. B. This SECTION takes effect for projects approved by a county on or after January 1,2026. SECTION 10. Article 9, Chapter 7, Title 13 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Article 9 Governor's Nuclear Advisory Council Section 13-7-810.  There is hereby established a Nuclear Advisory Council in the Department of Administrationthe SC Nexus for Advanced Resilient Energy at the Department of Commerce, which shall be responsible to the Director Secretary of the Department of AdministrationDepartment of Commerce and the council shall report to the Governor. The council shall be referred to as the Governor's Nuclear Advisory council. Section 13-7-820.  The duties of the council, in addition to such other duties as may be requested by the Governor, shall be: (1) to provide advice and recommendations to the Governor on issues involving the use, handling, and management of the transportation, storage, or disposal of nuclear materials within South Carolina, or such use, handling, transportation, storage, or disposal of nuclear materials outside of the State which may affect the public health, welfare, safety, and environment of the citizens of South Carolina; (2) to provide advice and recommendations to the Governor regarding matters pertaining to the Atlantic Compact Commission; (3) to provide advice and recommendations to the Governor regarding the various programs of the United States Department of Energy pertaining to nuclear waste; (4) to meet at the call of the chair or at a minimum twice a year; (5) to engage stakeholders and develop a strategic plan to advance the development of nuclear generation, including advanced nuclear generation such as small modular reactors, molten salt reactors, fusion energy, and spent nuclear fuel recycling facilities and fusion energy to serve customers in this State in the most economical manner at the earliest reasonable time possible;. (6) to provide advice and recommendations to the Governor and the EPI regarding the various emerging nuclear technologies; (7) to provide advice and recommendations to the Governor and the EPI regarding commercial applications for new nuclear projects; (8) to develop a statewide strategy for implementation and advancement of nuclear energy in the State's energy profile; (9) to provide advice and recommendations to the Governor and the EPI regarding the statewide nuclear energy strategy; and (10) to engage stakeholders and to monitor activities at the Department of Energy's Savannah River Site, electric utility company nuclear reactor facilities, and nuclear fuel manufacturing facilities in the State. Section 13-7-830.  The recommendations described in Section 13-7-62013-7-820 shall be made available to the General Assembly and the Governor. Section 13-7-840.  (A) The council shall consist of nineeleven members. One at-large member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives from the membership of House of Representatives and one at-large member shall be appointed by the President of the Senate from the membership of the Senate. SevenNine members shall be appointed by the Governor as follows: two shall be actively involved in the area of environmental protection; one two shall have experience in the generation of power by nuclear means; one shall have experience in the field of nuclear activities other than power generation; two shall be scientists or engineers from the faculties of institutions of higher learning in the State; and onetwo shall be from the public at large. The Governor shall select the chairman from the members of the board. The terms of the members of the council appointed by the Governor shall be coterminous with that of the appointing Governor, but they shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. (B) Vacancies of the council shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment. Section 13-7-850.  The Governor shall designate the chairman from the membership. When on business of the council, members shall be entitled to receive such compensation as provided by law for boards and commissions. Section 13-7-860.  Staff support for the council shall be provided by the Department of Administration SC Nexus for Advanced Resilient Energy at the Department of Commerce. SECTION 11. Chapter 27, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-27-836. A commercial data center, as defined in Section 58-27-835, must report to the Department of Environmental Services annually by January 31 the amount of surface water and ground water the commercial data center utilized within the prior twelve months and the anticipated amount of surface water and ground water to be utilized during the next twelve months. The Department of Environmental Services may assess a civil penalty against the owner of a commercial data center of not more than ten thousand dollars for each day after January 31 the information is not received. SECTION 12. Chapter 27, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 24 Electric Rate Stabilization Section 58-27-2700.  A public utility providing retail electric service, in its discretion and at any time, may elect to have the terms of this article apply to its rates and charges for retail electric service, on a prospective basis, by filing a notice of the election with the commission and on the same day and by the same means serving a copy on the Office of Regulatory Staff. Upon receipt of notice of the election, the commission shall proceed to make the findings and establish the ongoing procedures required for adjustments in base rates to be made under this article. In carrying out the procedures established by this article with respect to such an election, the commission shall rely upon and utilize the approved rates, charges, revenues, expenses, capital structure, returns, and other matters established in the public utility's most recent general rate proceeding pursuant to Section 58-27-860; provided, however, that the most recent order must have been issued no more than five years prior to the initial election to come under the terms of this article and the utility must file an application for a general rate proceeding every five years after such election. A public utility may combine an election under this article with the filing of a rate proceeding pursuant to Section 58-27-860. The commission shall include the findings required by this article in its rate orders issued in the Section 58-27-860 proceedings, and the election shall remain in effect until the next general rate proceeding. Section 58-27-2710.  The election by a utility to have the terms of this article apply to its rates and charges for retail electric service once made shall remain in effect until the next general rate proceeding for the public utility under Section 58-27-860, at which time the public utility may then elect to continue the applicability of this article to its rates and charges or elect to opt out of the provisions of this article. The applicant may withdraw its request to come under the terms of this article at any time before the entry of a final order of the commission on the merits of the proceeding in which the election is made or on a petition for rehearing in the proceeding. Section 58-27-2720.  In issuing its order pursuant to Section 58-27-2710, and in addition to the other requirements of Section 58-27-2710, if a proceeding pursuant to that section is required, then: (1) the commission shall specify a range for the utility's cost of equity that includes a band of fifty basis points (0.50 percentage points) below and fifty basis points (0.50 percentage points) above the cost of equity on which rates have been set; and (2) the commission separately shall state the amount of the utility's net plant in service, construction work in progress, accumulated deferred income taxes, inventory, working capital, and other rate base components. It also shall state the utility's depreciation expense, operating and maintenance expense, income taxes, taxes other than income taxes, other components of income for return, revenues, capital structure, cost of debt, overall cost of capital, and earned return on common equity. The figures stated shall be those which the commission has determined to be the appropriate basis on which rates were set in the applicable orders. Section 58-27-2730.  The utility shall file with the commission monitoring reports for each twelve-month period ending on March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31 of each year, the filings to be made no later than the fifteenth day of the third month following the close of the period. The utility shall serve a copy of such reports on the Office of Regulatory Staff on the same day and by the same means as they are provided to the commission. These quarterly monitoring reports shall include: (1) the utility's actual net plant in service, construction work in progress, accumulated deferred income taxes, inventory, working capital, and other rate base components. The report shall also show the utility's depreciation expense, operating and maintenance expense, income taxes, taxes other than income taxes, other components of income for return, revenues, capital structure, cost of debt, overall cost of capital, and earned return on common equity; (2) all applicable accounting and pro forma adjustments historically permitted or required by the commission for the utility in question or for similarly situated utilities, authorized by general principles of utility accounting, or authorized by accounting letters or orders issued by the commission. This authorization may occur either in a general rate hearing or in any other type of filing or hearing that the commission considers appropriate. However, other parties shall be given sufficient opportunity to review and provide comments on any proposed accounting letter or order issued after the initial order allowing future base rate adjustments pursuant to this article; (3) pro forma adjustments to annualize for the twelve-month period any rate adjustments imposed pursuant to this article or other events affecting only part of the period covered by the filing so that the annualization is required to show the effects of those events on the utility's earnings going forward; and (4) pro forma or other adjustments required to properly account for atypical, unusual, or nonrecurring events. Section 58-27-2740.  (A) In the monitoring report filed for the twelve-month period ending December thirty-first of each year, the utility shall provide additional schedules indicating the following revenue calculations: (1) if the utility's earnings exceed the upper end of the range established in the order, then the utility shall calculate the reduction in revenue required to lower its return on equity to the midpoint of the range established in the order; or (2) if the utility's earnings are below the lower range established in the order, then the utility shall calculate the additional revenue required to increase its return on equity to the midpoint of the range established in the order. (B) The utility also shall provide a schedule that specifies changes in its tariff rates required to achieve any indicated change in revenue. (C) The proposed rate changes, filed by the utility, shall conform as nearly as is practicable with the revenue allocation principles contained in the most recent rate order. Section 58-27-2750.  The Office of Regulatory Staff shall review the monitoring report filed pursuant to Section 58-27-2730 and Section 58-27-2740 to determine compliance with its terms, taking into account the findings of any audit conducted by the Office of Regulatory Staff concerning compliance with Section 58-27-2730 and Section 58-27-2740. The Office of Regulatory Staff shall propose those adjustments it determines to be required to bring the report into compliance with Section 58-27-2740. Based upon that report and the findings of any audit conducted by the Office of Regulatory Staff, the commission shall order the utility to make the adjustments to tariff rates necessary to achieve the revenue levels indicated in Section 58-27-2740. Section 58-27-2760.  The procedures contained in this section shall apply to monitoring reports related to the quarter ending December 31. (1) The utility shall file the monitoring reports annually with the commission and Office of Regulatory Staff on or before March 15. (2) In cases where the monitoring report indicates rate adjustments are required, or where it otherwise appears to the commission or the Office of Regulatory Staff that an adjustment in rates may be warranted under this article, the commission shall issue a Notice of Filing annually on or before March 31 and require interested persons to file a petition to intervene annually on or before May 15. The commission shall maintain a register of parties who have notified the commission in writing that they wish to be provided with any Notice of Filing related to specified utilities and the commission shall use reasonable efforts to provide such parties with Notices of Filing by such utilities, provided that the failure to do so shall not invalidate any subsequent proceedings. Intervenors shall have discovery rights related to the matters set forth in Section 58-27-2730. (3) The Office of Regulatory Staff shall conduct an audit of the monitoring report to ascertain the reasonableness and prudency of all matters contained therein and specify any changes that the Office of Regulatory Staff determines to be necessary to correct errors in the report or to otherwise bring the report into compliance with this article. The Office of Regulatory Staff's audit report shall be verified and provided to the commission and to the utility and made available annually to all parties of record no later than June 1. Other parties of record shall also be allowed until June 1 of each year to file verified written comments and submit documentary evidence to the commission and the Office of Regulatory Staff in response to the utility's monitoring report. (4) The utility shall be allowed until June 15 of each year to file verified written comments and submit documentary evidence to the commission and the Office of Regulatory Staff related to the utility's monitoring report and may request a non-evidentiary hearing before the commission concerning the utility's monitoring report. (5) On or before July 15 of each year, the commission shall issue an initial order setting forth any changes required in the utility's request to adjust rates under this article (the "Initial Order"). In the absence of such an Initial Order, the electric rate adjustment contained in the utility's filing shall be considered granted as filed. (6) Any electric rate adjustments authorized under the terms of this article shall take effect for all bills rendered on or after the first billing cycle of August of that year. Section 58-27-2770.  In calculating its revenue requirement under Section 58-27-2730, and apart from the recovery of a return on construction work in progress, an electric utility may not include in plant service its investments in any new electric generating facility of more than two hundred fifty megawatts, or the costs associated with operating such a facility, except through a general electric rate proceeding under Section 58-27-860 and Section 58-27-870 or through a contested case proceeding for the limited purpose of establishing the prudence of the facility under this section. Section 58-27-2780.  Within thirty days of the issuance of an Initial Order pursuant to Section 58-27-2760, or within thirty days of the failure by the commission to issue an order as required pursuant to Section 58-27-2760, any aggrieved party may petition the commission for review of the Initial Order or failure to issue an order and all interested parties of record shall have a right to be heard at an evidentiary hearing on the matter. The party shall serve a copy of such petition on the Office of Regulatory Staff and other parties of record on the same day and by the same means as it is provided to the commission. Section 58-27-2790.  (A) After conducting the hearing required by Section 58-27-2780, the commission shall issue a final order that: (1) sets forth any changes that are required to the rates approved in the Initial Order issued under Section 58-27-2760(5); (2) determines the amount of any overcollection or undercollection by the utility that resulted from collection of the rates authorized in the Initial Order as compared to the rates authorized in the final order issued under this section; and (3) establishes a credit to refund the amount of any overcollection, or a surcharge to collect the amount of any undercollection that arose during the time that the rates approved in the Initial Order were collected, and requires the utility to apply the credit or surcharge until such time as the overcollection or undercollection is exhausted. (B) The commission shall issue any final order required under this section by December thirty-first of the year in which the monitoring report was filed. The order shall make the corrected rates and the credit or surcharge, if any, effective as of the first billing cycle of May of that year. (C) The provisions of Sections 58-27-2150 and 58-27-2310 concerning rehearing and appeal shall apply to the orders issued pursuant to this section. Section 58-27-2800.  The review of Initial Orders pursuant to Section 58-27-2780 and Section 58-27-2790 is limited to issues related to compliance with the terms of this article. Matters determined in orders issued pursuant to Section 58-27-2720 are not subject to review except in full rate proceedings pursuant to Section 58-27-2740. Any proceedings pursuant to this article are without prejudice to the right of the commission to issue, or any interested party to request issuance of, a rule to show cause why a full rate proceeding should not be initiated, nor does this article limit the right of a utility to file an application pursuant to Section 58-27-870 for an adjustment to its rates and charges, nor does it impose the restrictions on filings contained in Section 58-27-870(E). Section 58-27-2810.  (A) The Office of Regulatory Staff is authorized to create additional positions as the General Assembly may provide in the annual General Appropriations Act for the purpose of performing its duties under this article; however, no more than two positions for each electric utility regulated pursuant to this article may be authorized. All salaries, benefits, expenses, and charges incurred by the Office of Regulatory Staff for these positions must be borne by the electric utilities regulated pursuant to this article. (B) On or before the first day of July in each year, the Department of Revenue must assess each electric utility regulated pursuant to this article an equal portion of these salaries, benefits, expenses, and charges on June 30 preceding that on which the assessment is made which is due and payable on or before July 15. The assessments must be charged against the electric utilities by the Department of Revenue and collected by the department in the manner provided by law for the collection of taxes from the electric utilities, including the enforcement and collection provisions of Article 1, Chapter 54 of Title 12 and paid, less the Department of Revenue actual incremental increase in the cost of administration into the state treasury as other taxes collected by the Department of Revenue for the State. These assessments are in addition to any amounts assessed pursuant to Section 58-4-60. These assessments must be deposited in a special fund with the State Treasurer's Office from which the salaries, benefits, expenses, and charges shall be paid. (C) The Office of Regulatory Staff must annually certify to the Department of Revenue on or before May 1 the amounts to be assessed. SECTION 13.Article 3, Chapter 33, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-33-196. Electrical utilities and the Public Service Authority are encouraged to explore the potential for deploying fusion energy and advanced nuclear facilities including, but not limited to, small modular nuclear facilities at suitable sites. Suitable sites may include sites of current nuclear facilities, sites where nuclear facilities have been proposed but not constructed, and other brownfield sites, such as coal-generation sites. Any utility pursuing deployment of such nuclear facilities must provide annual progress reports to the commission and the Public Utilities Review Committee; this report may be in writing or in the form of testimony in an appropriate proceeding. A utility whose rates are regulated by the commission must provide estimates of the cost of the studies including, but not limited to, planning, licensing, and project development to the commission. If the commission finds such estimated costs are reasonable, prudent, and in the public interest, such costs may be recoverable through rates as they are incurred. Nothing in this section relieves an electrical utility of the burden of filing for a certificate under this article and obtaining appropriate approvals from the commission before commencing construction. SECTION 14. Chapter 37, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-37-70.  (A) It is the policy of this State to promote the development and operation of advanced nuclear facilities, including small modular nuclear reactors, in the most economical manner and at the earliest reasonable time possible. These facilities are intended to provide electricity that is reliable, resilient, secure, and free of carbon dioxide emissions, as well as promote this state's economic development and industry retention. (B) As used in this section: (1) "Electrical utility" has the same meaning as provided in Section 58-27-10(7). (2) "Site" means the geographic location of one or more small modular nuclear reactors. (3) "Small modular nuclear reactor" means an advanced nuclear reactor that produces nuclear power and has a power capacity of up to 500 megawatts per reactor. (C)(1) Electrical utilities and the South Carolina Public Service Authority shall evaluate the potential for deploying small modular nuclear facilities at suitable sites within this State. A "suitable site" may include sites of current nuclear facilities, sites where nuclear facilities have been proposed but not constructed, and brownfield sites, such as coal generation sites. (2) Such an evaluation may include cost estimates of further studies related to a potential small modular nuclear facility to serve customers in South Carolina. This includes, but is not limited to, planning, licensing, and project development, the anticipated timeline of an early site permit, current possibilities or barriers to co-ownership of such facilities, and available federal benefits which may defray costs of these facilities. (3) Electric utilities and the Public Service Authority must provide reports on such evaluations to the Public Utilities Review Committee, the Nuclear Advisory Council, and the Public Service Commission by December 31, 2027. SECTION 15.A. Chapter 37, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 3 Energy Infrastructure Projects Section 58-37-100. As used in this article: (1) "Agency" means any agency, department, board, commission, or political subdivision of this State. However, it does not include the Public Service Commission, except for Sections 58-37-110 and 58-37-120. (2) "Application" means a written request made to an agency for grant of a permit or approval of an action or matter within the agency's jurisdiction pertaining to an energy infrastructure project. (3) "Brownfield energy site" means an existing or former electrical generating site or other existing or former industrial site. (4) "Energy corridor" means a corridor in which a utility or the South Carolina Public Service Authority has: (a) transmission lines with a rated voltage of at least 110 kilovolts, including the substations, switchyards, and other appurtenant facilities associated with such lines; or (b) high pressure natural gas transmission pipelines and the metering, compression stations, valve station, and other appurtenant facilities associated with such lines. (5) "Energy corridor project" means an energy infrastructure project that involves the expansion of electric or natural gas delivery capacity in whole or in principal part within an existing energy corridor. (6) "Energy infrastructure project" means the construction, placement, authorization, or removal of energy infrastructure including, but not limited to, electric transmission and generation assets, natural gas transmission assets, and all associated or appurtenant infrastructure and activities, including communications and distribution infrastructure. (7) "Permit" means a permit, certificate, approval, registration, encroachment permit, right of way, or other form of authorization. (8) "Person" means an individual, corporation, association, partnership, trust, agency, or the State of South Carolina. Section 58-37-110. (A) Given the importance of sufficient, reliable, safe, and economical energy to the health, safety, and well-being of the citizens of South Carolina and to the state's economic development and prosperity, the General Assembly finds that the prompt siting, permitting, and completion of energy infrastructure projects, energy corridor projects, and brownfield electrical generation projects are crucial to the welfare of the State. (B) All agencies are instructed to give expedited review of applications for energy infrastructure projects, to provide reasonable and constructive assistance to applicants to allow the applicants to comply with any law and regulatory requirements as expeditiously as possible, and to be guided by the policy goals established in subsection (A). (C) All agencies are instructed to give due weight to the reduction in the environmental, aesthetic, and socioeconomic impacts that are incurred to support the safe, reliable, and economic provision of energy to the people of South Carolina when energy infrastructure projects can be located in existing energy corridors or on brownfield energy sites, and shall consider the relative reductions in such impacts compared to greenfield projects in evaluating projects in existing energy corridors or on brownfield energy sites. Section 58-37-120. (A)(1) Any agency presented with an application for a permit for an energy infrastructure project shall promptly provide a public comment period and shall review and issue a decision on the application no later than six months after the date the application is received by the agency. If the agency fails to undertake review of and take  final action upon the application  within the  six month review period, as defined in subsection (A)(3), the application shall be deemed approved, and the agency shall promptly issue documentation of such approval. (2) Within thirty days of receipt of an application, the agency shall determine if the application is complete. If the agency determines the application is incomplete, the agency will notify the applicant, and the applicant will have fifteen days to complete the application. The applicant and the agency may mutually agree in writing to extend the time period for completion of the application. After the fifteen days, or the mutually agreed upon date for completion, if the agency determines the application is incomplete, then the agency may deny the application. (3) The six-month review period shall commence upon the date of filing unless the application is deemed incomplete pursuant to subsection (A)(2). In the event the application as submitted is determined by the agency to be incomplete, the six month review period shall commence upon the date such application is determined by the agency to be complete, provided that such completion occurs within the period provided for in subsection (A)(2). (B) A permit applicant for an energy infrastructure project shall not submit an application for the project prior to conducting a preapplication meeting with the agency to establish milestones within the six-month review period. (C) The applicant and agency may mutually agree in writing to extend the six-month review period. Such agreement shall be in writing and state a specific date on when the extension will end. The agency shall not stop, stay, or otherwise alter the review period without such written agreement with the applicant. (D) Upon receipt of an application, the agency shall promptly review it for sufficiency and shall provide the applicant with a list of all technical and administrative deficiencies within thirty days of receipt, or if a public comment period is required, fifteen days from the end of the comment period. The identification of by the agency of deficiencies in the application shall not toll the six-month period for agency determination. (E) No later than sixty days prior to filing any permit applications under this section, a public utility that plans to construct or has entered into agreements to construct any energy infrastructure project which may result in the use of eminent domain must provide written notice, via certified U.S. mail, to any property owners whose properties may be acquired or condemned. This notice must clearly state the need for the project, its preferred and any alternative locations or routes, a phone number or email that property owners may contact at the utility, and an appropriate contact at the Office of Regulatory Staff. No later than thirty days after filing an application, the utility must also hold a public meeting to solicit feedback from interested members of the affected community and on the date an application is filed, must provide notice of said meeting in a newspaper or other publication of general circulation in each county where the project may be located and in writing to all landowners whose property may be condemned. Section 58-37-130. The applicant or any person whose private rights are affected by an agency decision or action on an application for a permit for any energy infrastructure project may appeal that decision or action to the South Carolina Supreme Court. The Supreme Court shall hear these appeals as a direct appeal in accordance with South Carolina Appellate Court. The Court shall provide for an expedited briefing and hearing of the appeal, in preference to all other nonemergency matters on its docket, and decide such appeals on an expedited basis. Any agency decision or action that is subject to a contested case review before the Administrative Law Court, pursuant to Section 1-23-600 et. seq., shall be appealable under this section upon issuance of an appealable order by the Administrative Law Court. South Carolina Administrative Law Court for a contested case review pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act. The Administrative Law Court shall issue its final order on the matter within one year, except in cases which the Administrative Law Court determines the case should be extended beyond one year for good cause. The Administrative Law Court's final order shall be immediately appealable to the South Carolina Supreme Court in accordance with South Carolina Appellate Court Rule 203. Section 58-37-140. The provisions of this article shall expire ten years after its effective date. B. All other sections of Chapter 37 may be cited as Article 1, entitled "Planning for Energy Supply." SECTION 16. Section 58-40-10(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) "Customer-generator" means the owner, operator, lessee, or customer-generator lessee of an electric energy generation unit which: (1) generates or discharges electricity from a renewable energy resource, including an energy storage device configured to receive electrical charge solely from an onsite renewable energy resource; (2) has an electrical generating system with a capacity of: (a)(i) not more than the lesser of one thousand kilowatts (1,000 kW AC) or one hundred percent of contract demand if a nonresidential customer; or (ii) after June 1, 2025, not more than the lesser of five thousand kilowatts (5,000kW AC) or one hundred percent of contract demand for a nonresidential customer, provided the customer-generator is on a time-of-use rate schedule and any excess energy produced by the customer-generator is credited and reset at the end of each monthly period; or (iii) more than five thousand kilowatts (5,000kW AC) if agreed to by the customer-generator and the electrical utility, provided that the electrical utility submits the agreement to the commission for consideration and approval if the commission finds the agreement to contain appropriate ratemaking provisions and is in the public interest; or (b) not more than twenty kilowatts (20 kW AC) if a residential customer; (3) is located on a single premises owned, operated, leased, or otherwise controlled by the customer; (4) is interconnected and operates in parallel phase and synchronization with an electrical utility and complies with the applicable interconnection standards; (5) is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's own electrical energy requirements; and (6) meets all applicable safety, performance, interconnection, and reliability standards established by the commission, the National Electrical Code, the National Electrical Safety Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, Underwriters Laboratories, the federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and any local governing authorities. SECTION 17. Section 58-41-30 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-41-30.  (A) The ability to utilize clean energy resources for electric power generation is important to attract prospective commercial or industrial entities to invest in South Carolina and to encourage and incent robust economic growth in the State. (B) The commission shall be responsive to the clean energy needs of customers and the economic development and industry retention implications for the State when reviewing and approving voluntary clean energy programs. The commission shall consider updates to these voluntary renewable energy programs on an ongoing basis. (C) Within one hundred and twenty days of the effective date of this chapter, subject to subsection (F), each electrical utility shall file a proposed voluntary renewable energy program for review and approval by the commission, unless as of July 1, 2025, the electrical utility already has a voluntary renewable energy program that conforms with the requirements of this section on file with the commission. The commission shall conduct a proceeding to review the program and establish reasonable terms and conditions for the program. Interested parties shall have the right to participate in the proceeding. The commission maymust periodically hold additional proceedings to update the programevaluate whether updates to the programs are necessary. At a minimum, each electrical utility must submit to the commission a program for whichthe program shall provide that: (1) the participating customer shall have the right to select the renewable energy facility and negotiate with the renewable energy supplier on the price to be paid by the participating customer for the energy, capacity, and clean energy environmental attributes of the renewable energy facility and the term of such agreement so long as such terms are consistent with the voluntary renewable program service agreement as approved by the commission; (2) the renewable energy contract and the participating customer agreement must be of equal duration; (3) in addition to paying a retail bill calculated pursuant to the rates and tariffs that otherwise would apply to the participating customer, reduced by the amount of the generation credit, a participating customer shall reimburse the electrical utility on a monthly basis for the amount paid by the electrical utility to the renewable energy supplier pursuant to the participating customer agreement and renewable energy contract, plus an administrative fee approved by the commission; and (4) eligible customers must be allowed to bundle their demand under a single participating customer agreement and renewable energy contract and must be eligible annually to procure an amount of capacity as approved by the commission. (D) The commission must approve voluntary renewable energy programs, in addition to those provided for in subsection (C), where the participating customer purchases clean energy environmental attributes of new or existing renewable energy facilities owned and operated and recovered on a cost-of-service basis by the electrical utility or otherwise supplies through the execution of agreements with third parties within the utility's balancing authority area. Voluntary renewable energy programs shall also facilitate behind-the-meter options for customers and access to renewable energy resource generation. (B)(E) The commission may approve a program that provides for options that include, but are not limited to, both variable and fixed generation credit options. (C)(F) The commission mayshall limit the total portion of each electrical utility's voluntary renewable energy program that is eligible for the program at a level consistent with the public interest and shall provide standard terms and conditions for the participating customer agreement and the renewable energy contract, subject to commission review and approval. (D)(G) A participating customer shall bear the burden of any reasonable costs associated with participating in a voluntary renewable energy program. An electrical utility may not charge any nonparticipating customers for any costs incurred pursuant to the provisions of this section.Purchased power costs incurred by an electrical utility as a result of subsection (C) shall be recovered in the electrical utility's fuel clause pursuant to Section 58-27-865. (E)(H) A renewable energy facility may be located anywhere in the electrical utility's service territory within the utility's balancing authority. (F) If the commission determines that an electrical utility has a voluntary renewable energy program on file with the commission as of the effective date of this chapter, that conforms with the requirements of this section, the utility is not required to make a new filing to meet the requirements of subsection (A). SECTION 18. Section 58-41-10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (17) "Energy storage facilities" means any commercially available technology that is capable of absorbing energy and storing it for a period of time for use at a later time including, but not limited to, electrochemical, thermal, and electromechanical technologies. SECTION 19. Section 58-41-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-41-20.  (A) As soon as is practicable after the effective date of this chapter, the commission shall open a docket for the purpose of establishing each electrical utility's standard offer, avoided cost methodologies, form contract power purchase agreements, commitment to sell forms, and any other terms or conditions necessary to implement this section. Within six months after the effective date of this chapter, and at least once every twenty-four months thereafter, the commission shall approve each electrical utility's standard offer, avoided cost methodologies, form contract power purchase agreements, commitment to sell forms, and any other terms or conditions necessary to implement this section. Within such proceeding the commission shall approve one or more standard form power purchase agreements for use for qualifying small power production facilities not eligible for the standard offer. Such power purchase agreements shall contain provisions, including, but not limited to, provisions for force majeure, indemnification, choice of venue, and confidentiality provisions and other such terms, but shall not be determinative of price or length of the power purchase agreement. The commission may approve multiple form power purchase agreements to accommodate various generation technologies and other project-specific characteristics. This provision shall not restrict the right of parties to enter into power purchase agreements with terms that differ from the commission-approved form(s). Any decisions by the commission shall be just and reasonable to the ratepayers of the electrical utility, in the public interest, consistent with PURPA and the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission's implementing regulations and orders, and nondiscriminatory to small power producers;, and shall strive to reduce the risk placed on the using and consuming public. (1) Proceedings conducted pursuant to this section shall be separate from the electrical utilities' annual fuel cost proceedings conducted pursuant to Section 58-27-865. (2) Proceedings shall include an opportunity for intervention, discovery, filed comments or testimony, and an evidentiary hearing. (B) In implementing this chapter, the commission shall treat small power producers on a fair and equal footing with electrical utility-owned resources by ensuring that: (1) rates for the purchase of energy and capacity fully and accurately reflect the electrical utility's avoided costs; (2) power purchase agreements, including terms and conditions, are commercially reasonable and consistent with regulations and orders promulgated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission implementing PURPA; and (3) each electrical utility's avoided cost methodology fairly accounts for costs avoided by the electrical utility or incurred by the electrical utility, including, but not limited to, energy, capacity, and ancillary services provided by or consumed by small power producers including those utilizing energy storage equipment. Avoided cost methodologies approved by the commission may account for differences in costs avoided based on the geographic location and resource type of a small power producer's qualifying small power production facility. (C) The avoided cost rates offered by an electrical utility to a small power producer not eligible for the standard offer must be calculated based on the avoided cost methodology most recently approved by the commission. In the event that a small power producer and an electrical utility are unable to mutually agree on an avoided cost rate, the small power producer shall have the right to have any disputed issues resolved by the commission in a formal complaint proceeding. The commission may require mediation prior to a formal complaint proceeding. (D) A small power producer shall have the right to sell the output of its facility to the electrical utility at the avoided cost rates and pursuant to the power purchase agreement then in effect by delivering an executed notice of commitment to sell form to the electrical utility. The commission shall approve a standard notice of commitment to sell form to be used for this purpose that provides the small power producer a reasonable period of time from its submittal of the form to execute a power purchase agreement. In no event, however, shall the small power producer, as a condition of preserving the pricing and terms and conditions established by its submittal of an executed commitment to sell form to the electrical utility, be required to execute a power purchase agreement prior to receipt of a final interconnection agreement from the electrical utility. (E)(1) Electrical utilities shall file with the commission power purchase agreements entered into pursuant to PURPA, resulting from voluntary negotiation of contracts between an electrical utility and a small power producer not eligible for the standard offer. (2) The commission is authorized to open a generic docket for the purposes of creating programsapprove programs proposed by electrical utilities for the competitive procurement of energy and capacity from renewable energy facilities and, at the electrical utility's option, associated co-located energy storage by an electrical utility within the utility's balancing authority area if the commission determines such action to be in the public interest. (3) In establishing standard offer and form contract power purchase agreements, the commission shall consider whether such power purchase agreements should prohibit any of the following: (a) termination of the power purchase agreement, collection of damages from small power producers, or commencement of the term of a power purchase agreement prior to commercial operation, if delays in achieving commercial operation of the small power producer's facility are due to the electrical utility's interconnection delays; or (b) the electrical utility reducing the price paid to the small power producer based on costs incurred by the electrical utility to respond to the intermittent nature of electrical generation by the small power producer. (F)(1) Electrical utilities, subject to approval of the commission, shall offer to enter into fixed price power purchase agreements with small power producers for the purchase of energy and capacity at avoided cost, with commercially reasonable terms and a duration of ten years. The commission may also approve commercially reasonable fixed price power purchase agreements with a duration longer than ten years, which must contain additional terms, conditions, and/or rate structures as proposed by intervening parties and approved by the commission, including, but not limited to, a reduction in the contract price relative to the ten year avoided cost. Notwithstanding any other language to the contrary, the commission will make such a determination in proceedings conducted pursuant to subsection (A). The avoided cost rates applicable to fixed price power purchase agreements entered into pursuant to this item shall be based on the avoided cost rates and methodologies as determined by the commission pursuant to this section. The terms of this subsection apply only to those small power producers whose qualifying small power production facilities have active interconnection requests on file with the electrical utility prior to the effective date of this act. The commission may determine any other necessary terms and conditions deemed to be in the best interest of the ratepayers. This item is not intended, and shall not be construed, to abrogate small power producers' rights under PURPA that existed prior to the effective date of the act. (2) Once an electrical utility has executed interconnection agreements and power purchase agreements with qualifying small power production facilities located in South Carolina with an aggregate nameplate capacity equal to twenty percent of the previous five-year average of the electrical utility's South Carolina retail peak load, that electrical utility shall offer to enter into fixed price power purchase agreements with small power producers for the purchase of energy and capacity at avoided cost, with the terms, conditions, rates, and terms of length for contracts as determined by the commission in a separate docket or in a proceeding conducted pursuant to subsection (A). The commission is expressly directed to consider the potential benefits of terms with a longer duration to promote the state's policy of encouraging renewable energy. (G) Nothing in this section prohibits the commission from adopting various avoided cost methodologies or amending those methodologies in the public interest. (H) Unless otherwise agreed to between the electrical utility and the small power producer, a power purchase agreement entered into pursuant to PURPA may not allow curtailment of qualifying facilities in any manner that is inconsistent with PURPA or implementing regulations and orders promulgated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. (I) The commission is authorized to employ, through contract or otherwise, third-party consultants and experts in carrying out its duties under this section, including, but not limited to, evaluating avoided cost rates, methodologies, terms, calculations, and conditions under this section. The commission is exempt from complying with the State Procurement Code in the selection and hiring of a third-party consultant or expert authorized by this subsection. The commission shall engage, for each utility, a qualified independent third party to submit a report that includes the third party's independently derived conclusions as to that third party's opinion of each utility's calculation of avoided costs for purposes of proceedings conducted pursuant to this section. The qualified independent third party is subject to the same ex parte prohibitions contained in Chapter 3, Title 58 as all other parties. The qualified independent third party shall submit all requests for documents and information necessary to their analysis under the authority of the commission and the commission shall have full authority to compel response to the requests. The qualified independent third party's duty will be to the commission. Any conclusions based on the evidence in the record and included in the report are intended to be used by the commission along with all other evidence submitted during the proceeding to inform its ultimate decision setting the avoided costs for each electrical utility. The utilities may require confidentiality agreements with the independent third party that do not impede the third-party analysis. The utilities shall be responsive in providing all documents, information, and items necessary for the completion of the report. The independent third party shall also include in the report a statement assessing the level of cooperation received from the utility during the development of the report and whether there were any material information requests that were not adequately fulfilled by the electrical utility. Any party to this proceeding shall be able to review the report including the confidential portions of the report upon entering into an appropriate confidentiality agreement. The commission and the Office of Regulatory Staff may not hire the same third-party consultant or expert in the same proceeding or to address the same or similar issues in different proceedings. (J) Each electrical utility's avoided cost filing must be reasonably transparent so that underlying assumptions, data, and results can be independently reviewed and verified by the parties and the commission. The commission may approve any confidentiality protections necessary to allow for independent review and verification of the avoided cost filing. SECTION 20. Chapter 41, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-41-25.  (A) Unless an electrical utility makes an application pursuant to subsection (F) or (G), electrical utilities may file for commission approval of a program for the competitive procurement of renewable energy facilities which may also include, at the utility's option, associated co-located energy storage facilities, also referred to as "eligible facilities," or purchase one-hundred percent of the output from such eligible facilities, including all energy, capacity, ancillary services, and environmental and renewable attributes. Eligible facilities may be located anywhere in the electrical utility's balancing authority area to meet needs for new generation and energy storage resources identified by the electrical utility's integrated resource plan and associated filings. The commission may not grant approval unless the commission finds and determines that the electrical utility satisfied the requirements of this section and the proposed program is just and reasonable and in the best interests of the electrical utility's customers. (B) An electrical utility's competitive procurement program filed pursuant to this section must describe the solicitation process, eligibility criteria, timelines, bid evaluation methodology, and identify whether resources procured are intended to also service customer-directed renewable energy procurement programs. The program must be designed to procure renewable energy facilities and at the utility's election, associated co-located energy storage resources, or the output of those facilities, subject to the following requirements: (1) renewable energy facilities, and if applicable, energy storage resources, or their output, must be procured via a competitive solicitation process open to all market participants that meet minimum stated eligibility requirements; (2) the electrical utility shall issue public notification of its intention to issue a competitive solicitation to procure renewable energy facilities and associated co-located energy storage facilities, if applicable, at least ninety days prior to the release of the solicitation, including identifying the proposed target procurement volume, procurement process, and timeline for administering the solicitation; (3) renewable energy facilities eligible to participate in competitive procurement are those that use renewable generation resources identified in Section 58-39-120(F), which must also satisfy that electrical utility's capacity, energy, or operational needs, as identified by the electrical utility, and take into account the required operating characteristics of the needed capacity; (4) energy storage facilities, if included by the electrical utility in the solicitation, must be associated equipment located at the same site as the renewable energy facility; (5) electrical utilities may seek to ensure that their procurement of eligible facilities results in a reasonable balance of ownership of eligible facilities between such utility, including its affiliates and unrelated market participants, and may offer self-developed proposals. However, if an electrical utility or its affiliate seek to participate in the procurement, the electrical utility's program must include an independent evaluator to evaluate all bids offered and to ensure they are fairly and competitively evaluated. For purposes of this section, "independent evaluator" means an independent third party retained by the electrical utility that has no ownership in the electrical utility or a market participant and has the skills and experience necessary to oversee the solicitation process and provide the utility with an independent evaluation of all proposals for ultimate selection. At the conclusion of the solicitation, the independent evaluator shall report to the commission on the openness and fairness of the bid evaluation process and certify that the selection of proposals adhered to the evaluation methodology and requirement of the program. (C) An electrical utility must make the following publicly available at least forty-five days prior to each competitive solicitation: (1) pro-forma contract to inform prospective market participants of the procurement terms and conditions for the output purchased by the electrical utility from eligible resources. The pro-forma contract must: (a) provide for the purchase of renewable energy, capacity, and environmental and renewable attributes from renewable energy facilities owned and operated by third parties that commit to allow the procuring electrical utility rights to dispatch, operate, and control the solicited renewable energy facilities in the same manner as the electrical utility's own generating resources; (b) include standardized and commercially reasonable requirements for contract performance security; and (c) define limits and compensation for resource dispatch and curtailments. In the event an electrical utility chooses to procure output from co-located storage, the pro-forma contract must also cover similar terms and conditions as specified herein for those eligible facilities. (2) pro-forma agreements to govern the procurement of eligible facilities by the electrical utility from market participants; (3) bid evaluation methodology that ensures all bids are treated equitably, including price and non-price evaluation criteria; and (4) interconnection requirements, including specification of how bids without existing interconnection agreements will be treated for purposes of evaluation. (D) After bids are submitted and evaluated, the electrical utility will elect the winning bids based upon the public evaluation methodology. (E) An electrical utility shall file with the commission a public report summarizing the results of each competitive solicitation within thirty days of finalizing the contract with the winning bidder. The report must include, at a minimum, a summary of the bids received and an anonymized list of the project awards, including size, location, and average award price and tenor. (F) Nothwithstanding the requirements in subsections (B) and (C), the results of all other competitive procurement programs undertaken by an electrical utility within its balancing authority area outside of South Carolina that will serve customers in the electrical utility's balancing authority area within South Carolina and are open to equal participation by eligible facilities located within South Carolina may be approved by the commission if the commission determines such programs enable economic, reliable, and safe operation of the electricity grid in a manner consistent with the public interest. For purposes of this section, "public interest" shall also include the ability of customers to subscribe to customer programs which leverage the competitively procured solar and potential storage contemplated within this section. Any electrical utility that requests acceptance of a system-wide procurement pursuant to this section must demonstrate to the commission that the utility has adhered to subsection (D) as defined in that specific competitive procurement program and submit the post solicitation report to the commission, as required by subsection (E). (G) The commission may determine that a competitive procurement program within an electrical utility's balancing authority area outside of South Carolina that serves customers in the utility's area within South Carolina and is open to equal participation by eligible facilities located within South Carolina satisfies the requirements of this section. (H) Electrical utilities are permitted to recover costs incurred pursuant to this section, including reasonable and prudent administrative costs to develop and propose procurements under this section, and if approved by the commission, the costs resulting from such procurements through rates established pursuant to Section 58-27-865 or otherwise through rates established pursuant to Section 58-27-870. If the commission denies an application made pursuant to subsection (F) or (G) of this section, and the utility continues with the procurement, then the utility must allocate all costs and benefits associated with the resources being procured away from South Carolina customers. (I) An electrical utility administering a program for the competitive procurement of renewable energy resources and storage facilities that has been approved by the commission pursuant to Section 58-41-25 that is open to qualifying small power production facilities located in South Carolina may utilize such programs as means to satisfy its purchase obligations for avoidable capacity from qualifying small power production facilities under the Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act, consistent with Section 58-41-20(F)(3). SECTION 21. Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 42 Competitive Procurement Section 58-42-10.  (A) The General Assembly finds that it is in the public interest for the state's electrical utilities to competitively procure targeted volumes of renewable energy and co-located energy storage resources. The General Assembly further finds that it is in the public interest for the state's electrical utilities to competitively procure certain stand-alone storage additions to be located in South Carolina. These procurements shall be consistent with the electric utilities' 2023 integrated resource plans as approved by the commission or the subsequent annual integrated resource plan updates as approved by the commission. The resources procured pursuant to this section are intended to be placed in service on or before January 1, 2035. The volumes of each procurement may be increased or decreased as provided in this section. If an electrical utility proposes an amount of solar or storage in a future integrated resource plan filing that is lower than the amount contained in the electrical utility's 2023 integrated resource plan as approved by the commission, the electrical utility shall include and analyze at least one scenario consistent with the electrical utilities' 2023 preferred resource portfolio that includes volumes of solar and storage consistent with that contained in the 2023 integrated resource plans as approved by the commission. (B) The electrical utilities shall procure the resources referred to in subsection (A) through at least a biennial competitive procurement process consistent with the requirements of Sections 58-42-20 and 58-42-30, and in accordance with this section. The target volume in each competitive procurement shall be consistent with the volume of resources needed to be procured at that time to achieve the resource in-service dates specified in the electrical utility's 2023 integrated resource plan as approved by the commission or a subsequent integrated resource plan annual update as approved by the commission. (C) The amount of renewable energy or energy storage resources required to be procured by each electrical utility pursuant to this section shall be reduced by the alternating current ("AC") nameplate capacity of any facility of the same resource type for which such electrical utility enters into a power purchase agreement after the effective date of this section pursuant to the electrical utility's mandatory purchase obligation under Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act or pursuant to a prior competitive procurement which had not resulted in an executed power purchase agreement prior to the enactment date of this section, provided that the facility is placed in service in 2035 or earlier. (D) The target resource volumes for each competitive procurement shall reflect any increases or decreases included in the electrical utility's most recently approved integrated resource plan or integrated resource plan update. The electric utility may, at its option, include the procurement of non-renewable generation resources as part of its procurement of renewable and storage resources pursuant to this section. (E) The target resource volumes for competitive procurement shall take into account any changes in siting opportunities that may be affected by local permitting, zoning, or other regulatory or legal challenges. (F) The target resource volumes for competitive procurement by the electrical utility shall be increased to account for replacing megawatts associated with: (1) any inability by the electrical utility to reach target procurement volumes in prior procurement cycles; (2) the inability of renewable energy or energy storage resources procured in any prior procurement cycles to be placed in service; and (3) the expiration of any existing contracts for qualifying facilities pursuant to the Public Utility Regulatory Practices Act. All target resource volumes referenced in this subsection shall be consistent with the needs identified in the most recently commission approved integrated resource plan or integrated resource plan update. (G) Prior to making final awards in a competitive procurement, the electrical utility shall confirm that the resources selected are cost effective using methodologies and current inputs reflected in the applicable integrated resource plan or integrated resource plan update approved by the commission for that electrical utility. (H) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, the results of competitive procurements within an electrical utility's balancing area outside of South Carolina that serve customers in the electrical utility's balancing area within South Carolina shall be approved or accepted by the commission as specified in 58-42-20(G). (I) Notwithstanding Section 58-41-20(F)(2), electrical utilities shall continue to offer to qualifying small power production facilities power purchase agreements for the purchase of energy and capacity at avoided cost, with commercially reasonable terms and a duration of up to ten years, until the competitive procurement requirements of this section have been satisfied. Section 58-42-20.  (A) For purposes of this chapter: (1) "Electrical utility" shall be defined as in Section 58-27-10, provided, however, that electrical utilities serving less than 100,000 customers shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter unless otherwise provided. (2) "Energy storage facility" means commercially available technology that can absorb energy and store it for later use, including, but not limited to, electrochemical, thermal, and electromechanical technologies but not including pumped hydroelectric facilities. (3) "Renewable energy facility" has the same meaning as defined in Section 58-39-120(E). (4) "Renewable energy resource" has the same meaning as "renewable generation resource" as defined in Section 58-39-120(F). (B) Unless an electrical utility makes an application pursuant to subsection (G), electrical utilities shall file for commission approval a program for the competitive procurement of renewable energy resources and such amount of associated co-located energy storage facilities as determined by the commission to meet needs for new generation and energy storage resources identified by the electrical utility's integrated resource plan or other planning process. A competitive procurement program may be used to procure any subset of energy, capacity, ancillary services, and environmental and renewable attributes. The commission may not grant approval of the program unless it finds that the electrical utility has satisfied all the requirements of this section and that the proposed program is in the best interests of the customers of the electrical utility. Co-located energy storage facilities, if included in the solicitation, must be associated equipment located at the same site as the renewable energy facility. (C) Electrical utilities shall procure renewable energy resources and co-located energy storage facilities, or the output of such facilities, subject to the following requirements: (1) Renewable energy and co-located energy storage resources, or their output, procured by electrical utilities shall be procured via a competitive solicitation process open to all market participants that meet minimum eligibility requirements. (2) The electrical utility shall issue public notice of its intention to issue a competitive renewable energy and co-located energy storage solicitation, or both, at least ninety days prior to the commencement of each solicitation. This notice must include the proposed procurement volume, process, and timeline. (3) The electrical utility shall provide a reasonable period of time for interested parties to review and comment on proposed requests for proposals, bid instructions, and bid evaluation criteria, and for commission approval, prior to finalization and issuance. (4) Renewable energy facilities eligible to participate in a competitive procurement are those that use renewable energy resources. (5) Energy storage facilities eligible to participate in a competitive procurement are those identified in Section 58-42-20(A)(2) installed an operated in conjunction with a renewable energy facility. (6) The electrical utility shall be required to use an independent evaluator or independent administrator to oversee or manage the competitive procurement, as determined appropriate by the commission. (7) The procurement of renewable energy facilities and co-located energy storage facilities and the output of such facilities shall result in a reasonable balance of electrical utility and independent third-party ownership of eligible facilities, as determined by the commission. The electrical utility and its affiliates may offer proposals into the competitive procurement provided that appropriate safeguards are in place to ensure that such proposals do not receive any advantage in the bid evaluation process. (D) An electrical utility shall make publicly available at least forty-five days prior to each competitive solicitation: (1) A commission-approved pro forma contract to inform prospective market participants of the procurement terms and conditions. The pro forma contract must: (i) include standardized and commercially reasonable requirements for contract performance security consistent with market standards; and (ii) define limits and compensation for resource dispatch and curtailment. (2) A bid and portfolio evaluation methodology that: (i) ensures all bids are treated equitably, including price and nonprice evaluation criteria; and (ii) ensures electrical utility and independent third-party owned facilities are treated equitably with regards to resource dispatch and curtailments. (3) Interconnection requirements including specification of how bids without existing interconnection studies must be treated for purposes of evaluation. (E) After bids are submitted and evaluated, final winning bids will be selected based upon the published evaluation methodology. (F) An electrical utility shall issue a public report summarizing the results of each competitive solicitation within sixty days of the award notifications. The report shall include, at minimum, a summary of the submitted bids and an anonymized list of the project awards, including their size, location, average award price and tenor, and award price range. Electrical utilities are permitted to recover costs incurred through such competitive procurement through rates established pursuant to Section 58-27-865 or Section 58-27-870. (G) Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 58-42-10 and this section, the commission shall approve an electrical utility's competitive procurement of energy storage facilities or renewable energy resources and the output of energy storage facilities or renewable energy resources within an electrical utility's balancing area outside of South Carolina that serve customers within South Carolina if eligible energy storage facilities or renewable energy resources located within South Carolina were allowed to participate in the competitive procurement and if the commission determines that the results of such procurement are in the public interest and enable the economic, reliable, and safe operation of the electric grid. Electrical utilities shall be permitted to recover costs incurred through such competitive procurements through rates established pursuant to Section 58-27-865 or Section 58-27-870. However, if the commission determines that the results of the procurement are not in the public interest for South Carolina, then the costs and benefits associated with such procurement shall be allocated away from South Carolina customers. (H) The commission is authorized to adopt rules or procedures for conducting a procurement authorized by this section. Section 58-42-30.  (A) Within six months from the date of the enactment of this chapter, the commission shall open a docket to establish a competitive procurement program for each electrical utility for energy storage facilities to be located in South Carolina. Solicitations shall be subject to the following limitations: (1) For transmission-connected energy storage (excluding pumped hydro) the electrical utilities shall conduct a competitive procurement for such resources, including utility-self developed projects. Each electrical utility shall file the proposed details of its competitive procurement process no later than twelve months after the date of the enactment of this chapter. (2) The target procurement volume for stand-alone storage acquisition may not exceed the portion of stand-alone storage in the most recent commission approved integrated resource plan or integrated resource plan annual update that is equal to the portion of the respective electrical utility's peak load attributable to South Carolina customers. (3) Stand-alone energy storage facilities with a design capacity less than or equal to twenty megawatts and intended primarily to address local reliability improvements or local capacity constraints are not subject to the competitive procurement requirements of this section. (4)(a) The procurement of stand-alone energy storage facilities shall result in a reasonable balance of the electrical utility and independent third-party ownership of eligible facilities, as determined by the commission. (b) An electrical utility and its affiliates may offer proposals into the competitive procurement provided that appropriate safeguards are in place to ensure that such proposals do not receive any advantage in the bid evaluation process. Electrical utility costs associated with facilities owned by an independent third-party power producer shall be capitalized and included within the electrical utility's rate base for ratemaking purposes. (B) Competitively procured stand-alone storage shall be subject to operational protocols, equipment specifications and inspections established by the electric utility and which are necessary to ensure the reliability of the electrical utility system. Information regarding competitively procured stand-alone storage must be provided to the Office of Regulatory Staff. (C) Electrical utilities may recover costs incurred through such competitive procurement through rates established pursuant to Section 58-27-870. SECTION 22.A. Section 58-33-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (10) The term "like facility" with reference to generation facilities and without limitation, includes a facility or facilities that are proposed to provide capacity on a site currently or previously used for siting electric generation that replaces the capacity of a facility or facilities that are being retired, abandoned, brownfield, downrated, mothballed, or dedicated to standby or emergency service at the same site, limited to facilities no more than 300 megawatts for non-nuclear generation, so long as those new facilities will provide an amount of effective load-carrying capacity that in whole or in part will serve to replace the capacity to be lost as a result of retirement, capacity lost as a result of abandonment, or in the case of nuclear generation, will serve to provide the facility and includes associated transmission facilities needed to deliver power from that facility to customers. A "like facility" with reference to transmission facilities and, without limitation, includes any facility that represents the rebuilding, reconductoring, paralleling, increasing voltage, adding circuits or otherwise reconfiguring of an existing transmission line or other transmission facilities including, without limitation, projects to increase the capacity of such facilities, provided such facilities are: (a) located materially within a utility right of way or corridor; or (b) substantially located on the property of a customer, prospective customer, or the State. B. Section 58-33-20(2)(a) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) The term "major utility facility" means: (a) electric generating plant and associated facilities designed for, or capable of, operation at a capacity of more than seventy-five megawatts. SECTION 23. Article 3, Chapter 33, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Article 3 Certification of Major Utility Facilities Section 58-33-110. (1) No person shall commence to construct a major utility facility without first having obtained a certificate issued with respect to such facility by the Commissioncommission. The replacement of an existing facility with a like facility, as determined by the Commissioncommission, shall not constitute construction of a major utility facility. Upon application for a determination by the commission that a proposed utility facility constitutes a like facility replacement, the commission must issue a written order approving or denying the application within sixty days of filing. Any facility, with respect to which a certificate is required, shall be constructed, operated, and maintained in conformity with the certificate and any terms, conditions, and modifications contained therein. A certificate may only be issued pursuant to this chapter; provided, however, any authorization relating to a major utility facility granted under other laws administered by the Commissioncommission shall constitute a certificate if the requirements of this chapter have been complied with in the proceeding leading to the granting of such authorization. (2) A certificate may be transferred, subject to the approval of the Commissioncommission, to a person who agrees to comply with the terms, conditions and modifications contained therein. (3) A certificate may be amended. (4) This chapter shall not apply to any major utility facility: (a) the construction of which is commenced within one year after January 1, 1972; or (b) for which, prior to January 1, 1972, an application for the approval has been made to any federal, state, regional, or local governmental agency which possesses the jurisdiction to consider the matters prescribed for finding and determination in subsection (1) of Section 58-33-160; or (c) for which, prior to January 1, 1972, a governmental agency has approved the construction of the facility and indebtedness has been incurred to finance all or part of the cost of such construction; or (d) which is a hydroelectric generating facility over which the Federal Power CommissionFederal Energy Regulatory Commission has licensing jurisdiction; or (e) which is a transmission line or associated electrical transmission facilities constructed by the South Carolina Public Service Authority,: (i) for which construction either is commenced within one year after January 1, 2022,; or(ii) which is necessary to maintain system reliability in connection with the closure of the Winyah Generating Station, provided that such transmission is not for generation subject to this chapter; or (iii) which is necessary to serve an identified commercial or industrial customer to promote economic development or industry retention as determined by the South Carolina Public Service Authority and agreed to by the Office of Regulatory Staff. In the event such an agreement is reached, the Office of Regulatory Staff shall provide a letter to the commission and the Public Utilities Review Committee with a description of the agreement. (5) Any person intending to construct a major utility facility excluded from this chapter pursuant to subsection (4) or Section 58-33-20(10) of this section may elect to waive the exclusion by delivering notice of the waiver to the Commissioncommission. This chapter shall thereafter apply to each major utility facility identified in the notice from the date of its receipt by the Commissioncommission. (6) The Commissioncommission shall have authority to waive the normal notice and hearing requirements of this chapter and to issue a certificate on an emergency basis if it finds that immediate construction of a major utility facility is justified by public convenience and necessity; provided, that the Public Service Commission shall notify all parties concerned under Section 58-33-140 prior to the issuance of such certificate; provided, further, that the Commissioncommission may subsequently require a modification of the facility if, after giving due consideration to the major utility facility, available technology and the economics involved, it finds such modification necessary in order to minimize the environmental impact. (7) The Commissioncommission shall have authority, where justified by public convenience and necessity, to grant permission to a person who has made application for a certificate under Section 58-33-120 to proceed with initial clearing, excavation, dredging, and construction. Pending an application for determination of a like facility, no ;  provided, however, permission from the commission shall be required to proceed with initial clearing, excavation, dredging, and initial construction of any proposed like facility; provided that in engaging in such clearing, excavation, dredging, or construction, the person shall proceed at his own risk, and such early action in advance of a determination permission shall not in any way indicate approval by the Commissioncommission of the proposed site or like facility. (8)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of item (7), and not limiting the provisions above, a person may not commence construction of a major utility facility for generation in the State of South Carolina without first having made a demonstration  In seeking a certificate, the applicant must provide credible information demonstrating that the facility to be built has been compared to other generation options in terms of cost, reliability, schedule constraints, fuel cost and availability, transmission constraints and costs, ancillary services capabilities, current and reasonably expected future environmental costs and restrictions, that the facility supports system efficiency and reliability in light of those considerations, and any other regulatory implications deemed legally or reasonably necessary for consideration by the commission. The commission is authorized to adopt rules for such evaluation of other generation options. (b) The commission may, upon a showing of a need, require a commission-approved process that includes:Office of Regulatory Staff may provide to the commission a report that includes any or all of the following: (i) thean assessment of an unbiased independent evaluator retained by the Office of Regulatory Staff as to reasonableness of any certificate sought under this section for new generation; (ii) a report from the independent evaluator to the commission regarding the transparency, completeness, and integrity of bidding processes, if any; (iii) an assessment of whether there was a reasonable period for interested parties to review and comment on proposed requests for proposals, bid instructions, and bid evaluation criteria, if any, prior to finalization and issuance, subject to any trade secrets that could hamper future negotiations; however, the independent evaluator may access all such information; (iv) independent evaluator access and review of final bid evaluation criteria and pricing information for any and all projects to be evaluated in comparison to the request for proposal bids received; (v) access through discovery, subject to appropriate confidentiality, attorney-client privilege or trade secret restrictions, for parties to this proceeding to documents developed in preparing the certificate of public convenience and necessity application; (vi)(iv) a demonstration thatan assessment of whether the facility is consistent with an integrated resource plan or update approved bypreviously filed with the commission or is otherwise justified by generation planning modeling comparable to that filed as part of the utility's integrated resource plan but updated with current data concerning system loads, fuel prices, environmental regulations, location-specific transmission costs, updated construction costs and updated construction timelines, updated costs of gas supply facilities, if any, and other relevant costs, schedules or inputs establishing that the facility in question supports system economy and reliability; and (vii)(v) an assessment detailing the treatment of utility affiliates in the same manner as compared to nonaffiliates participating in the request for proposal process, if any. (9) The applicant may, but must not be required to, issue requests for proposals or otherwise conduct market procurement activities in support of the showings required pursuant to this chapter. (10) Not withstanding any other provision in this section, an electrical utility serving customers in this state may seek a certificate of public convenience and necessity when building a major utility facility, as defined in Section 58-33-20(2), in another state but within the electrical utility's balancing area serving customers in South Carolina. In such a case, the provisions of Sections 58-33-120, 58-33-140, and 58-33-160(1)(b), (c), and (e) shall not apply, but all other requirements of this section affecting customers in this state shall apply. In addition: (a) an applicant for a certificate shall file an application with the commission in such form as the commission may prescribe. The application must contain the following information: (i) a description of the location and of the major utility facility to be built; (ii) a summary of any studies which have been made by or for the applicant of the environmental impact of the major utility facility; (iii) a statement explaining the need for the major utility facility; (iv) any other information the applicant may consider relevant or as the commission may by regulation or order require. A copy of the report referred to in item (8)(b) must be filed with the commission, if ordered by the commission, and shall be available for public information. (b) If the commission denies an application made pursuant to this section and the utility continues to build such major utility facility, the utility must allocate all costs and benefits associated with the major utility facility away from the utility's South Carolina customers. (c) If the commission approves an application made pursuant to this subsection, the commission, for all future requests related to the major utility facility, shall utilize South Carolina law in determining costs and benefits for the utility's South Carolina customers. Section 58-33-120. (1) An applicant for a certificate shall file an application with the commission, in such form as the commission may prescribe. The application must contain the following information: (a) a description of the location and of the major utility facility to be built; (b) a summary of any studies which have been made by or for applicant of the environmental impact of the facility; (c) a statement explaining the need for the facility; and (d) any other information as the applicant may consider relevant or as the commission may by regulation or order require. A copy of the study referred to in item (b) above shall be filed with the commission, if ordered, and shall be available for public information. (2) Each application shall be accompanied by proof of service of a copy of the application on the Office of Regulatory Staff, the chief executive officer of each municipality, and the head of each state and local government agency, charged with the duty of protecting the environment or of planning land use, in the area in the county in which any portion of the facility is to be located. The copy of the application shall be accompanied by a notice specifying the date on or about which the application is to be filed. (3) Each application also must be accompanied by proof that public notice was given to persons residing in the municipalities entitled to receive notice under subsection (2) of this section, by the publication of a summary of the application, and the date on or about which it is to be filed, in newspapers of general circulation as will serve substantially to inform such persons of the application. (4) Inadvertent failure of service on, or notice to, any of the municipalities, government agencies, or persons identified in subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be cured pursuant to orders of the commission designed to afford them adequate notice to enable their effective participation in the proceeding. In addition, the commission may, after filing, require the applicant to serve notice of the application or copies thereof, or both, upon such other persons, and file proof thereof, as the commission may deem appropriate. (5) An application for an amendment of a certificate shall be in such form and contain such information as the commission shall prescribe. Notice of the application shall be given as set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. Section 58-33-130. (1) Upon the receipt of an application complying with Section 58-33-120, the Commissioncommission shall promptly fix a date for the commencement of a public hearing, not less than sixty nor more than ninety days after the receipt, and shall conclude the proceedings as expeditiously as practicablecomplete the hearing and issue an order on the merits within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the application. (2) The testimony presented at the hearing may be presented in writing or orally, provided that the Commissioncommission may make rules designed to exclude repetitive, redundant or irrelevant testimony; however, all expert testimony must be prefiled with the commission, with responsive expert testimony of non-applicants being received with enough time for the applicant to meaningfully respond, and in no case would expert testimony be filed less than twenty days before the hearing. (2)(3) On an application for an amendment of a certificate, the Commissioncommission shall hold a hearing in the same manner as a hearing is held on an application for a certificate if the proposed change in the facility would result in any significant increase in any environmental impact of the facility or a substantial change in the location of all or a portion of the facility; provided, that the Public Service Commission shall forward a copy of the application to all parties upon the filing of an application. Section 58-33-140. (1) The parties to a certification proceeding shall include: (a) the applicant; (b) the Office of Regulatory Staff, the Department of Health and Environmental ControlDepartment of Environmental Services, the Department of Natural Resources, and the Department of Parks, Recreation and Tourism; (c) each municipality and government agency entitled to receive service of a copy of the application under subsection (2) of Section 58-33-120 if it has filed with the commission a notice of intervention as a party within thirty days after the date it was served with a copy of the application; and (d) any person residing in a municipality entitled to receive service of a copy of the application under subsection (2) of Section 58-33-120, any domestic nonprofit organization, formed in whole or in part to promote conservation or natural beauty, to protect the environment, personal health, or other biological values, to preserve historical sites, to promote consumer interest, to represent commercial and industrial groups, or to promote the orderly development of the area in which the facility is to be located; or any other person, if such a person or organization has petitioned the commission for leave to intervene as a party, within thirty days after the date given in the published notice as the date for filing the application, and if the petition has been granted by the commission for good cause shown. (2) Any person may make a limited appearance in the sixty days after the date given in the published notice as the date for filing the application. No person making a limited appearance shall be a party or shall have the right to present oral testimony or argument or cross-examine witnesses. (3) The commission may, in extraordinary circumstances for good cause shown, and giving consideration to the need for timely start of construction of the facility, grant a petition for leave to intervene as a party to participate in subsequent phases of the proceeding, filed by a municipality, government agency, person, or organization which is identified in paragraphs (b) or (c) of subsection (1) of this section, but which failed to file a timely notice of intervention or petition for leave to intervene, as the case may be. Section 58-33-150. A record shall be made of theany hearing and of all testimony taken and the cross-examination thereon.  Upon request of a party, either before or after the decision, a State agency which proposes to or does require a condition to be included in the certificate as provided for in Section 58-33-160 shall furnish for the record all factual findings, documents, studies, rules, regulations, standards, or other documentation, supporting the condition.  The Commissioncommission may provide for the consolidation of the representation of parties having similar interests. Section 58-33-160. (1) The Commissioncommission shall render a decision upon the record either granting or denying the application as filed, or granting it upon such terms, conditions or modifications of the construction, operation or maintenance of the major utility facility as the Commissioncommission may deem appropriate; such conditions shall be as determined by the applicable State agency having jurisdiction or authority under statutes, rules, regulations or standards promulgated thereunder, and the conditions shall become a part of the certificate. The Commissioncommission may notmust grant a certificate for the construction, operation and maintenance of a major utility facility, either as proposed or as modified by the Commissioncommission, unless it shall find and determine if it finds and determines that the applicant has shown: (a) The basis of the need for the facility. (b) The nature of the probable environmental impact. (c) That the impact of the facility upon the environment is justified, considering the state of available technology and the nature and economics of the various alternatives and other pertinent considerations. (d) That the facilities will serve the interests of system economy and reliability, and in the case of generating facilities, will do so considering reasonable available alternatives and their associated costs, risks, and operating attributes. (e) That there is reasonable assurance that the proposed facility will conform to applicable Statestate and local laws and regulations issued thereunder, including any allowable variance provisions therein, except that the Commissioncommission may refuse to apply any local law or local regulation if it finds that, as applied to the proposed facility, such law or regulation is unreasonably restrictive in view of the existing technology, or of factors of cost or economics or of the needs of consumers whether located inside or outside of the directly affected government subdivisions. (f) That public convenience and necessity require the construction of the facility. (2) If the Commissioncommission determines that the location of all or a part of the proposed facility should be modified, it may condition its certificate upon such modification, provided that the municipalities and persons residing therein affected by the modification shall have been given reasonable notice. (3) A copy of the decision and any opinionorder shall be served by the Commissioncommission upon each party. Section 58-33-170. In rendering a decision on an application for a certificate, the Commissioncommission shall issue an opinionorder stating its reasons for the action taken. If the Commissioncommission has found that any regional or local law or regulation, which would be otherwise applicable, is unreasonably restrictive pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of Section 58-33-160, it shall state in its opinionorder the reasons therefor. Section 58-33-180. (A)(1) In addition to the requirements of Articles 1, 3, 5, and 7 of Chapter 33, Title 58, a certificate for the construction of a major utility facility shall be granted only if the Public Service Authority demonstrates and proves by a preponderance of the evidence and the commission finds: (a)(1) the construction of a major utility facility constitutes a more cost-effective means for serving direct serve and wholesale customers than other feasibly available long-term power supply alternatives and provides less ratepayer risk while maintaining safe and reliable electric service than other feasibly available long-term power supply alternatives; and (b)(2) energy efficiency measures; demand-side management; renewable energy resource generation; available long-term power supply alternatives, or any combination thereof, would not establish or maintain a more cost-effective and reliable generation system and that the construction and operation of the facility is in the public interest. (2)(B) Available long-term power supply alternatives may include, but are not limited to, power purchase agreements, competitive procurement of renewable energy, joint dispatch agreements, market purchases from an existing regional transmission organization, joining or creating a new regional transmission organization, using best available technology for energy generation, transmission, storage and distribution, or any combination thereof. (3)(C) The commission shall consider any previous analysis performed pursuant to Section 58-37-40 in acting upon any petition by the Public Service Authority pursuant to this section. The commission shall also take into account the Public Service Authority's resource and fuel diversity, reasonably anticipated future operating costs, arrangements with other electric utilities for interchange of power, pooling of plants, purchase of power and other alternative methods for providing reliable, efficient, and economical electric service. (B)(D) The Public Service Authority shall file an estimate of construction costs in such detail as the commission may require.  No certificate shall be granted unless the commission has approved the estimated construction costs and made a finding that construction will be consistent with the Authority's commission-approved plan for expansion of electric generating capacity. Section 58-33-185. (A) The Public Service Authority may not enter into a contract for the acquisition ofacquire a major utility facility without approval of the Public Service Commission of South Carolina, provided that the approval is required only to the extent the transaction is not subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or any other federal agency. (B)(1) In acting upon any petition by the Public Service Authority pursuant to this section, the Public Service Authority must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the proposed transaction constitutes a more cost-effective means for serving direct serve and wholesale customers than other feasibly available long-term power supply alternatives and provides less ratepayer risk while maintaining safe and reliable electric service than other feasibly available long-term power supply alternatives. The commission shall consider any previous analysis performed pursuant to Section 58-37-40 in acting upon any petition by the Public Service Authority pursuant to this section. The commission shall also take into account the Public Service Authority's arrangements with other electric utilities for interchange of power, pooling of plants, purchase of power and other alternative methods for providing reliable, efficient, and economical electric service. (2) Available long-term power supply alternatives may include, but not be limited to, power purchase agreements of a different duration than proposed, competitive procurement of renewable energy, joint dispatch agreements, market purchases from an existing regional transmission organization, joining or creating a new regional transmission organization, using best available technology for energy generation, transmission, storage and distribution, or any combination thereof. (C) Application for the approval of the commission shall be made by the Public Service Authority and shall contain a concise statement of the proposed action, the reasons therefor, and such other information as may be required by the commission. (D) Upon the receipt of an application, the commission shall promptly fix a date for the commencement of a public hearing, not less than sixty nor more than ninety days after the receipt, and shall conclude the proceedings as expeditiously as practicable. The commission shall establish notice requirements and proceedings shall include an opportunity for intervention, discovery, filed comments or testimony, and an evidentiary hearing. (E) The commission shall render a decision upon the record either granting or denying the application as filed, or granting it upon such terms, conditions or modifications as the commission may deem appropriate. (F)(1) The commission may not grant approval unless it shall find and determine that the Public Service Authority satisfied all requirements of this section and the proposed transaction is in the best interests of the retail and wholesale customers of the Public Service Authority. (2) The commission also may require compliance with any provision of Article 3, Chapter 33, Title 58 that the commission determines necessary to grant approval. Section 58-33-190. (1) The Public Service Authority may not enter into a contract for the purchase of power with a duration longer than ten years without approval of the Public Service Commission of South Carolina, provided that the approval is required only to the extent the transaction is not subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or any other federal agency. This section does not apply to purchases of renewable power through a commission approved competitive procurement process. (2) The commission shall consider any previous analysis performed pursuant to Section 58-37-40 in acting upon any petition by the Public Service Authority pursuant to this section. The commission shall also take into account the Public Service Authority's resource and fuel diversity, reasonably anticipated future operating costs, arrangements with other electric utilities for interchange of power, pooling of plants, purchase of power, and other alternative methods for providing reliable, efficient, and economical electric service. (3) The commission may not grant approval unless it shall find and determine that the proposed transaction is in the best interests of the retail and wholesale customers of the Public Service Authority. SECTION 24. Section 58-37-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-37-40.  (A) Electrical utilities, electric cooperatives, municipally owned electric utilities, and the South Carolina Public Service Authority must each prepare an integrated resource plan. An integrated resource plan must be prepared and submitted at least every three years. Nothing in this section may be construed as requiring interstate natural gas companies whose rates and services are regulated only by the federal government or gas utilities subject to the jurisdiction of the commission to prepare and submit an integrated resource plan. (1) Each electrical utility with one hundred thousand or more customer accounts and the Public Service Authority must submit its integrated resource plan to the commission. The integrated resource plan must be posted on the electrical utility's website and on the commission's website. (2) Electric cooperatives, electric utilities with less than one hundred thousand customer accounts, and municipally owned electric utilities shall each submit an integrated resource plan to the State Energy Office. Each integrated resource plan must be posted on the State Energy Office's website. If an electric cooperative, electric utility with less than one hundred thousand customer accounts, or municipally owned utility has a website, its integrated resource plan must also be posted on its website. For distribution, electric cooperatives that are members of a cooperative that provides wholesale service, the integrated resource plan may be coordinated and consolidated into a single plan provided that nonshared resources or programs of individual distribution cooperatives are highlighted. Where plan components listed in subsection (B)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to a distribution or wholesale cooperative or a municipally owned electric utility as a result of the cooperative or the municipally owned electric utility not owning or operating generation resources, the plan may state that fact or refer to the plan of the wholesale power generator. Where plan components listed in subsection (B)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to an electrical utility with less than one hundred thousand customer accounts as a result of its own generation resources being comprised of more than seventy-five percent renewable energy or because it purchases wholesale load balancing generation services, then the plan may state that fact or refer to the plan of the wholesale power generator. For purposes of this section, a wholesale power generator does not include a municipally created joint agency if that joint agency receives at least seventy-five percent of its electricity from a generating facility owned in partnership with an electrical utility and that electrical utility: (a) generally serves the area in which the joint agency's members are located; and (b) is responsible for dispatching the capacity and output of the generated electricity. (3) The South Carolina Public Service Authority shall submit its integrated resource plan to the commission. The Public Service Authority shall develop a public process allowing for input from all stakeholders prior to submitting the integrated resource plan. The integrated resource plan must be developed in consultation with the electric cooperatives and municipally owned electric utilities purchasing power and energy from the Public Service Authority and consider any feedback provided by retail customers and shall include the effect of demand-side management activities of the electric cooperatives and municipally owned electric utilities that directly purchase power and energy from the Public Service Authority or sell power and energy generated by the Public Service Authority. The integrated resource plan must be posted on the commission's website and on the Public Service Authority's website. (4)(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 58-37-40(B), the Public Service Authority's integrated resource plan shall include an analysis of long-term power supply alternatives and enumerate the cost of various resource portfolios over various study periods including a twenty-year study period and, by comparison on a net present value basis, identify the most cost-effective and least ratepayer-risk resource portfolio to meet the Public Service Authority's total capacity and energy requirements while maintaining safe and reliable electric service. (b) In addition to the requirements of Section 58-37-40(B), the commission shall review and evaluate the Public Service Authority's analysis of long-term power supply alternatives and various resource portfolios over various study periods including a twenty-year study period and, by comparison on a net present value basis, identify the most cost-effective and lowest ratepayer-risk resource portfolio to meet the Public Service Authority's total capacity and energy requirements while maintaining safe and reliable electric service. The commission's evaluation shall include, but not be limited to: (i) evaluating the cost-effectiveness and ratepayer-risk of self-build generation and transmission options compared with various long-term power supply alternatives, including power purchase agreements, competitive procurement of renewable energy, joint dispatch agreements, market purchases from an existing regional transmission organization, joining or creating a new regional transmission organization, using best available technology for energy generation, transmission, storage and distribution, or any combination thereof. In evaluating and identifying the most cost-effective and least ratepayer-risk resource portfolio, the commission shall strive to reduce the risk to ratepayers associated with any generation and transmission options while maintaining safe and reliable electric service; and (ii) an analysis of any potential cost savings that might accrue to ratepayers from the retirement of remaining coal generation assets. (c) The Authority's integrated resource plan must provide the information required in Section 58-37-40(B) and must be developed in consultation with the electric cooperatives, including Central Electric Power Cooperative, and municipally owned electric utilities purchasing power and energy from the Public Service Authority, and consider any feedback provided by retail customers and shall include the effect of demand-side management activities of the electric cooperatives, including Central Electric Power Cooperative, and municipally owned electric utilities that directly purchase power and energy from the Public Service Authority or sell power and energy generated by the Public Service Authority. The Integrated Resource Plan of the South Carolina Public Service Authority shall include and evaluate at least one resource portfolio, which will reflect the closure of the Winyah Generating Station by 2028, designed to provide safe and reliable electric service while meeting a net zero carbon emission goal by the year 2050. (B)(1) An integrated resource plan shall include all of the following: (a) a long-term forecast of the utility's sales and peak demand under various reasonable scenarios; (b) the type of generation technology proposed for a generation facility contained in the plan and the proposed capacity of the generation facility, including fuel cost sensitivities under various reasonable scenarios; (c) projected energy purchased or produced by the utility from a renewable energy resource; (d) a summary of the electrical transmission investments planned by the utility; (e) several resource portfolios developed with the purpose of fairly evaluating the range of demand-side, supply-side, storage, and other technologies and services available to meet the utility's service obligations. Such portfolios and evaluations must include an evaluation of low, medium, and high cases for the adoption of renewable energy and cogeneration, energy efficiency, and demand response measures, including consideration of the following: (i) customer energy efficiency and demand response programs; (ii) facility retirement assumptions; and (iii) sensitivity analyses related to fuel costs, environmental regulations, and other uncertainties or risks; (f) data regarding the utility's current generation portfolio, including the age, licensing status, and remaining estimated life of operation for each facility in the portfolio; (g) plans for meeting current and future capacity needs with the cost estimates for all proposed resource portfolios in the plan; (h) an analysis of the cost and reliability impacts of all reasonable options available to meet projected energy and capacity needs; and (i) a forecast of the utility's peak demand, details regarding the amount of peak demand reduction the utility expects to achieve, and the actions the utility proposes to take in order to achieve that peak demand reduction.; and (j) a report addressing updates to the utility's transmission plan under the utility's open access transmission tariff pursuant to the federal jurisdictional planning process. In this report, the utility shall, when applicable, describe planned transmission improvements specific to siting of new resources expected to impact interconnection constraints or other operations of the systems. The utility shall also describe how it evaluated alternate transmission technologies when developing solutions for identified transmission needs for interconnecting resources. The utility's transmission report must include how the utility evaluates transmission investments, including: (i) a description of how the utility evaluated a range of transmission solutions, including non-wires alternatives, joint projects with neighboring and other regional utilities, other upgrades to existing facilities, and other best practices. Modeling may consider, as appropriate, grid-enhancing technologies and alternate transmission technologies such as static synchronous compensators, static Volt-Ampere Reactive (VAR) compensators, advanced power flow control devices, transmission switching, synchronous condensers, voltage source converters, advanced conductors, switchable reactors, and tower lifting in a manner consistent with common utility practice; (ii) a description of how transmission factored into the utility's evaluation of the range of future scenarios included in the fifteen-year time period of the utility's resource plan, including significant continued economic growth and the retirement of the utility's coal generation; (iii) a discussion of transmission considerations for facilities included in the utility's preferred resource plan for which there are particular sites specified; (iv) information such that intervenors and stakeholders can pursue participation in local transmission planning collaborative activities which are held pursuant to orders from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission; and (v) any other information that the utility believes is relevant to its resource plan or future transmission investments. (2) An integrated resource plan may include distribution resource plans or integrated system operation plans. (C)(1) The commission shall have a proceeding to review each electrical utility subject to subsection (A)(1) and the Public Service Authority's integrated resource plan. As part of the integrated resource plan filing, the commission shall allow intervention by interested parties. The procedural schedule shall include dates for completion of each phase of discovery, including discovery related to the integrated resource plan as filed, direct testimony of the applicant, direct testimony of the Office of Regulatory Staff and other parties and intervenors, and rebuttal testimony of the applicant. Except upon showing exceptional circumstances, all discovery shall be served in time to allow its completion, but not less than ten days prior to the hearing. The commission shall establish a procedural schedule to permit reasonable discovery after an integrated resource plan is filed in order to assist parties in obtaining evidence concerning the integrated resource plan, including the reasonableness and prudence of the plan and alternatives to the plan raised by intervening parties. No later than three hundred days after an electrical utility or the Public Service Authority files an integrated resource plan, the commission shall issue a final order approving, modifying, or denying the plan filed by the electrical utility or the Public Service Authority. (2) The commission shall approve an electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's integrated resource plan if the commission determines that the proposed integrated resource plan represents the most reasonable and prudent means of meeting the electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's energy and capacity needs as of the time the plan is reviewed.  To determine whether the integrated resource plan is the most reasonable and prudent means of meeting energy and capacity needs, the commission, in its discretion, shall consider whether the plan appropriately balances the following factors:In reviewing an integrated resource plan, the commission shall give due consideration as to the resources and actions necessary for the utility to fulfill compliance and reliability obligations pursuant to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, the North American Electric Reliability Corporation, the Southeastern Electric Reliability Council, and the Nuclear Regulatory Commission requirements, as well as environmental requirements applicable to resources serving customers in this state. Matters related to the scope and sufficiency of an electrical utility's demand-side plans and activities shall be considered exclusively in proceedings conducted pursuant to Section 58-37-20. In reviewing an integrated resource plan, the commission shall focus its review on the decisions which the applicant must make in the near term based on the triennial integrated resource plan under consideration at the time and shall approve a plan if it finds that the plan appropriately balances the following factors: (a) resource adequacy and capacity to serve anticipated peak electrical load, including the need for electric capacity and energy required to support economic development and industry retention in the electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's service territory and to meet applicable planning reserve margins; (b) consumer affordability and least reasonable cost considering the resources needed to support economic development and industry retention, and other risks and benefits; (c) compliance with applicable state and federal environmental regulations; (d) power supply reliability; (e) commodity price risks; (f) diversity of generation supply;  and (g) the efficiencies and optimum plans for any electrical utility system spanning state lines located within the electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's balancing authority area; and (h) other foreseeable conditions that the commission determines to be for the public's interest. (3) In modifying or rejecting an electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's integrated resource plan, the commission shall only require revisions that are reasonably anticipated to materially change resource procurement decisions to be made on the basis of the integrated resource plan under review. If the commission modifies or rejects an electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's integrated resource plan, the electrical utility or the Public Service Authority, within sixty days after the date of the final order, shall submit a revised plan addressing concerns identified by the commission and incorporating commission-mandated revisions to the integrated resource plan to the commission for approval. Within sixty days of the electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's revised filing, the Office of Regulatory Staff shall review the electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's revised plan and submit a report to the commission assessing the sufficiency of the revised filing. Other parties to the integrated resource plan proceeding also may submit comments. No later than sixty days after the Office of Regulatory Staff report is filed with the commission, the commission at its discretion may determine whether to accept the revised integrated resource plan or to mandate further remedies that the commission deems appropriate. (4) The submission, review, and acceptance of an integrated resource plan by the commission, or the inclusion of any specific resource or experience in an accepted integrated resource plan, shall not be determinative of the reasonableness or prudence of the acquisition or construction of any resource or the making of any expenditure. An electrical utility shall retain the burden of proof to show that all of its investments and expenditures are reasonable and prudent when seeking cost recovery in rates. (D)(1) An electrical utility and the Public Service Authority shall each submit annual updates to its integrated resource plan to the commission. An annual update must include an update to the electric utility's or the Public Service Authority's base planning assumptions relative to its most recently accepted integrated resource plan, including, but not limited to: energy and demand forecast, commodity fuel price inputs, renewable energy forecast, energy efficiency and demand-side management forecasts, changes to projected retirement dates of existing units, along with other inputs the commission deems to be for the public interest. The electrical utility's or Public Service Authority's annual update must describe the impact of the updated base planning assumptions on the selected resource plan. (2) The Office of Regulatory Staff shall review each electrical utility's or the Public Service Authority's annual update and submit a report within ninety days to the commission providing a recommendation concerning the reasonableness of the annual update. After reviewing the annual update and the Office of Regulatory Staff report, the commission may accept the annual update or direct the electrical utility or the Public Service Authority to make changes to the annual update that the commission determines to be in the public interest within sixty days from the submittal of the Office of Regulatory Staff's report. (E) Intervenors shall bear their own costs of participating in proceedings before the commission except that the commission may order utilities to provide software licenses to intervenors who are participating in litigated proceedings before the commission, where doing so is in the public interest. If software licenses are provided to intervenors, the intervenors shall reimburse the utility for the cost of the software use. Nothing in this subsection permits the disclosure of any utility information deemed confidential by statute, regulation, or a determination by the commission or obviates the intervenor's obligation to enter into a non-disclosure agreement pertaining to disclosure of confidential or trade secrets. (E)(F) The commission is authorized to promulgate regulations to carry out the provisions of this section. SECTION 25. Section 58-3-260 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-3-260.  (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Proceeding" means a contested case, generic proceeding, or other matter to be adjudicated, decided, or arbitrated by the commission. (2) "Person" means a party to a proceeding pending before the commission, a member of the Office of Regulatory Staff, a representative of a party to a proceeding pending before the commission, individuals, corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, elected officials of state government, and other public and elected officials. (3) "Communication" means the transmitting of information by any mode including, but not limited to, oral, written, or electronic. (4) "Allowable ex parte communication briefing" means any communication that is conducted pursuant to the procedure outlined in subsection (C)(D)(6) of this section. (5) "Communication of supplemental legal citation" means the submission, subsequent to the submission of post-hearing briefs or proposed orders in a proceeding, of statutes, regulations, judicial or administrative decisions that are enacted, promulgated, or determined after the submission of post-hearing briefs or proposed orders. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided herein or unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters specifically authorized by law, a commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee shall not communicate, directly or indirectly, regarding any issue that is an issue in any proceeding or can reasonably be expected to become an issue in any proceeding with any person without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication, nor shall any person communicate, directly or indirectly, regarding any issue that is an issue in any proceeding or can reasonably be expected to become an issue in any proceeding with any commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication. (2) "Issue" does not include: (a) general information concerning the operations, administration, planning, projects, customer service, storms or storm response, accidents, outages, or investments of an entity regulated by the commission that is not confidential and proprietary and is available to the public; or (b) any confidential information that affects energy security, such as physical or cybersecurity matters, provided that such information is also provided to the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff. Any communication pursuant to subitems (a) or (b) provided to the commission must also be provided in writing and must be posted on the commission's website with any confidential information redacted. (C) Commissioners must limit their consideration of matters before them to the record presented by the parties and may not rely on material not presented in the record by the parties. (C)(D) The following communications are exempt from the prohibitions of subsection (B) of this section: (1) a communication concerning compliance with procedural requirements if the procedural matter is not an area of controversy in a proceeding; (2) statements made by a commission employee who is or may reasonably be expected to be involved in formulating a decision, rule, or order in a proceeding, where the statements are limited to providing publicly available information about pending proceedings; (3) inquiries relating solely to the status of a proceeding, unless the inquiry: (a) states or implies a view as to the merits or outcome of the proceeding; (b) states or implies a preference for a particular party or which states why timing is important to a particular party; (c) indicates a view as to the date by which a proceeding should be resolved; or (d) is otherwise intended to address the merits or outcome or to influence the timing of a proceeding; (4) a communication made by or to commission employees that concerns judicial review of a matter that has been decided by the commission and is no longer within the commission's jurisdiction; however, if the matter is remanded to the commission for further action, the provisions of this section shall apply during the period of the remand; (5) where circumstances require, ex parte communications for scheduling, administrative purposes, or emergencies that do not deal with substantive matters or issues on the merits are authorized provided: (a) the commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee reasonably believes that no party will gain a procedural or tactical advantage as a result of the ex parte communication; and (b) the commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee makes provision promptly to notify all other parties of the substance of the ex parte communication and, where possible, allows an opportunity to respond; (6)(a) subject to the provisions of Chapter 4, of Title 30, communications, directly or indirectly, regarding any fact, law, or other matter that is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue in a proceeding for the purposes of an allowable ex parte communication briefing if: (i) the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff or his designee attends the briefing and files a written certification, within seventy-two hours of the briefing, attaching copies of all statements and all other matters filed by all persons pursuant to subsubitems (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection, with the chief clerk of the commission that such briefing was conducted in compliance with the provisions of this section and that each party, person, commissioner, or commission employee present has complied with the reporting and certification requirements of subsubitems (ii), (iii), and (iv);  and within twenty-four hours of the submission by the executive director, the commission posts on its web site the written certification, statements, and other matters filed by the executive director; (ii) each party, person, commissioner, and commission employee present files a written, certified statement with the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff within forty-eight hours of the briefing accurately summarizing the discussions in full and attaching copies of any written materials utilized, referenced, or distributed; (iii) each party, person, commissioner, and commission employee present, within forty-eight hours of the briefing, files a certification with the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff that (i) in the course of such briefing, no commissioner or commission employee shall make anyno commitment, predetermination, or prediction of any commissioner's action as to any ultimate or penultimate issue or any commission employee's opinion or recommendation as to any ultimate or penultimate issue in any proceeding was requested by any person or party nor shall any person request any commitment, predetermination, or prediction wasto be given by any commissioner or commission employee as to any commission action or commission employee opinion or recommendation on any ultimate or penultimate issue; (ii) the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff or his designee must attend the briefing and certify that the commissioners and commission employees complied with the provisions in subitem (i); (iv)(iii) each commissioner or commission employee present at the allowable ex parte communication briefing grants to every other party or person requesting an allowable ex parte communication briefing on the same or similar matter that is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue in a proceeding, similar access and a reasonable opportunity to communicate, directly or indirectly, regarding any fact, law, or other matter that is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue in a proceeding under the provisions of subsection (C)(D)(6) of this section and files a written, certified statement with the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff within forty-eight hours of the briefing stating that the commissioner or commission employee will comply with this provision; (v)(iv) the commission postsmust post on its web sitewebsite, at least five business days prior to the proposed briefing, a notice of each request for an allowable ex parte communication briefing that includes the date and time of the proposed briefing, the name of the person or party who requested the briefing, the name of each commissioner and commission employee whom the person or party has requested to brief, and the subject matter to be discussed at the briefing; (v) the commission must post on its website within three business days after the briefing, all nonconfidential materials and documents provided to the commission as part of the ex parte briefing and a statement signed by the chief clerk of the commission that the provisions of this subsection have been followed, including the justification for actions taken to preserve the confidentiality of any confidential information provided to the commission; (vi) the person or party initially seeking the briefing requestsmust request the briefing with sufficient notice, as required in subsubitem (v)(iv), to allow the initial briefing to be held at least twenty business days prior to the hearing in the proceeding at which the matter that is the subject of the briefing is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue, and the initial briefing must be held at least twenty business days prior to the hearing in the proceeding; and (vii) any person or party desiring to have a briefing on the same or similar matter as provided for in subsubitem (vi) shall be entitled to requestrequests a briefing so long as the request is made with sufficient time for notice, as required in subsubitem (v)(iv), to allow the briefing to be held at least ten business days prior to the hearing in the proceeding at which the matter that is the subject of the briefing is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue, and any such briefing must be held at least ten business days prior to the hearing in the proceeding; (b) any person or party may object to the attendance of the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff at an allowable ex parte communication briefing on the grounds of bias or a conflict of interest on the part of the executive director. Any such objection must be made in writing and must be filed with the executive director no later than twenty-four hours prior to the scheduled briefing. If the objecting person or party and the executive director agree upon a neutral person, that person shall serve in the executive director's stead and shall comply with the reporting and certification requirements of the executive director contained in subsubitem (i) and the executive director shall comply with the requirements contained in subsubitems (ii) and (iii). The costs of such person's services shall be charged to the party requesting the briefing and may be an allowable cost of the proceedings. If the objecting person or party and the executive director cannot agree upon a neutral person, the objecting person or party shall petition the Administrative Law Court for the appointment of a neutral person to serve in the executive director's stead, and the petition shall be given priority over all other matters within the jurisdiction of the Administrative Law Court. In the petition, the objecting party shall set forth the specific grounds supporting the objecting person's or party's allegation of bias or conflict on the part of the executive director and shall generally describe the matters to be discussed at the briefing. It shall not be sufficient grounds that the executive director is or is likely to be a party to a proceeding. The executive director shall be given an opportunity to respond. Part of the executive director's response shall include recommendations as to the experience required of the person to act in his stead. Upon a showing of actual bias or conflict of interest, the administrative law judge shall designate a person to act in the executive director's stead and that person shall comply with the reporting and certification requirements of the executive director contained in subsubitem (i) and the executive director shall comply with the requirements contained in subsubitems (ii) and (iii). Such person must have the expertise to act in the executive director's stead. The decision of the administrative law judge shall be considered interlocutory and not immediately appealable and may be appealed with the final order of the commission. The costs of such person's services shall be charged to the party requesting the briefing and may be an allowable cost of the proceedings; (c) should the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff desire to conduct an allowable ex parte communication briefing, the chief clerk of the commission shall appoint a neutral person who shall serve in the executive director's stead and that person shall comply with the reporting and certification requirements of the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff contained in subsubitem (i). The Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff shall comply with the requirements contained in subsubitems (ii) and (iii); (d)(b) nothing in subsection (C)(D)(6) of this section requires any commissioner or commission employee to grant a request for an allowable ex parte communication briefing, except as provided in subsection (C)(D)(6)(a)(iv)(iii) of this section; (7) a communication of supplemental legal citation if the party files copies of such documents, without comment or argument, with the chief clerk of the commission and simultaneously provides copies to all parties of record; (8) subject to the provisions of Chapter 4, of Title 30, communications between and among commissioners regarding matters pending before the commission; provided, further, that any commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee may receive aid from commission employees if the commission employees providing aid do not: (a) receive ex parte communications of a type that the commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee would be prohibited from receiving; or (b) furnish, augment, diminish, or modify the evidence in the record. (D)(E) If before serving in a proceeding, a commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee receives an ex parte communication of a type that may not properly be received while serving, the commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee must disclose the communication in the following manner: a commissioner, hearing officer, or a commission employee who receives an ex parte communication in violation of this section must promptly after receipt of the communication or, in the case of a communication prior to a filing, as soon as it is known to relate to a filing, place on the record of the matter all written and electronic communications received, all written and electronic responses to the communications, and a memorandum stating the substance of all oral communications received, all responses made, and the identity of each person from whom the commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee, as appropriate, received an ex parte communication and must advise all parties that these matters have been placed on the record. Within ten days after receipt of notice of the ex parte communication, any party who desires to rebut the contents of the communication must request and shall be granted the opportunity to rebut the contents. Parties affected by a violation may agree to a resolution of any claim regarding such violation, including the waiver of a hearing and the waiver of the obligation to report violations under subsection (I)(J) of this section. (E)(F) Any person who makes an inadvertent ex parte communication must, as soon as it is known to relate to an issue in a proceeding, disclose the communication by placing on the record of the matter the communication made, if written or electronic, or a memorandum stating the substance of an inadvertent oral communication, and the identity of each person to whom the inadvertent ex parte communication was made or given. Within ten days after receipt of notice of the ex parte communication, any party who desires to rebut the contents of the communication must request and shall be granted the opportunity to rebut the contents. If no party rebuts the inadvertence of the ex parte communication within ten days after notice of the ex parte communication, the ex parte communication shall be presumed inadvertent. Parties affected by a violation may agree to a resolution of any claim regarding such violation, and the provisions of subsection (J)(K) of this section shall not apply. (F)(G) If necessary to eliminate the effect of an ex parte communication received in violation of this section, a commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee who receives the communication may be disqualified by the commission, and the portions of the record pertaining to the communication may be sealed by protective order. (G)(H) Nothing in this section alters or amends Section 1-23-320(i). (H)(I) Nothing in this section prevents a commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee from: (1) attending educational seminars sponsored by state, regional, or national organizations and seminars not affiliated with any utility regulated by the commission; however, the provisions of this section shall apply to any communications that take place outside any formal sessions of any seminars or group presentations; or (2) conducting a site visit of a utility or Public Service Authority facility under construction or attending educational tours of utility or Public Service Authority plants or other facilities provided: (a) the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff or his designee also attends the site visit or educational tour; (b) a summary of the discussion is produced and posted on the commission's website, along with copies of any written materials utilized, referenced, or distributed; and (c) each party, person, commission, and commission employee who participated in the site visit or educational tour, within forty-eight hours of the site visit or educational tour, files a certification with the Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff that no commitment, predetermination, or prediction of any commissioner's action as to any ultimate or penultimate issue or any commission employee's opinion or recommendation as to any ultimate or penultimate issue in any proceeding was requested by any person or party, nor any commitment, predetermination, or prediction was given by any commissioner or commission employee as to any commission action or commission employee opinion or recommendation on any ultimate or penultimate issue. (I)(J) Subject to any privilege under Rule 501 of the South Carolina Rules of Evidence, any commissioner, hearing officer, commission employee, party, or any other person must report any wilful violation of this section on the part of a commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee to the review committee. (J)(K) Any commissioner, hearing officer, commission employee, or person who wilfully violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months. If a commissioner wilfully communicates with any party or person or if any person or party wilfully communicates with a commissioner regarding any fact, law, or other matter that is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue in a proceeding less than ten business days prior to the scheduled hearing on the merits, during the hearing or after the hearing but prior to the issuance of a final order, including an order on rehearing, in a proceeding where such facts, law, or other matter is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue, the commissioner shall be removed from office. If a hearing officer or commission employee wilfully communicates with any party or person or any party or person wilfully communicates with a hearing officer or commission employee regarding any fact, law, or other matter that is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue in a proceeding less than ten days prior to the scheduled hearing on the merits, during the hearing or after the hearing but prior to the issuance of a final order, including an order on rehearing, in a proceeding where such facts, law, or other matter is or can reasonably be expected to become an issue, the hearing officer or commission employee shall be terminated from employment by the commission. For purposes of this section: (1) "wilful" means an act done voluntarily and intentionally with the specific intent to do something the law forbids, or with specific intent to fail to do something the law requires to be done, that is to say with bad purpose either to disobey or disregard the law, and (2) a violation of the provisions of this section must be proved by clear and convincing evidence before a commissioner, hearing officer, or commission employee can be removed from office or terminated from employment. SECTION 26. Section 58-3-270(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) The administrative law judge assigned to the ex parte communication complaint proceeding by the Administrative Law Court may issue an order tolling any deadlines imposed by any state statute for a decision by the commission on the proceeding that is the subject of the ex parte communication complaint but only to the extent that the allegations of the complaint are verified and if found to be true would indicate that the proceeding was prejudiced to the extent that the commission is unable to consider the matter in the proceeding impartially. The administrative law judge assigned to the ex parte communication complaint proceeding by the Administrative Law Court must conduct a hearing and must issue a decision within sixty days after the complaint is filed. SECTION 27. Sections 58-33-310 through 58-33-320 of the S.C. Code are amended to read: Section 58-33-310. (A)(1) If a party wishes to file for a petition for rehearing or reconsideration from all or any portion of an order or decision of the commission, that petition must be filed within fifteen days from the commission issuing the order or decision. A response to the petition for rehearing or reconsideration must be filed within fifteen days from the filed date of the petition for rehearing or reconsideration. Failure to file for rehearing or reconsideration as required in this section constitutes a waiver of the party to further pursue the matter. (2) The commission must issue its final order within thirty days from the date the response to the petition for rehearing or reconsideration is filed. (B) Any party may appeal, in accordance with Section 1-23-380, from all or any portion of any final order or decision of the commission, including conditions of the certificate required by a state agency under Section 58-33-160 as provided by Section 58-27-2310.  Any appeals may be called up for trial out of their order by either party. (C) Any final order on the merits issued pursuant to this chapter shall be immediately appealable to the Supreme Court of South Carolina in accordance with South Carolina Appellate Court Rule 203,. The commission must not be a party to an appeal. Section 58-33-320. Except as expressly set forth in Section 58-33-310, no court of this State shall have jurisdiction to hear or determine any issue, case, or controversy concerning any matter which was or could have been determined in a proceeding before the commission under this chapter or to stop or delay the construction, operation, or maintenance of a major utility facility, except to enforce compliance with this chapter or the provisions of a certificate issued hereunder, and any such action shall be brought only by the Office of Regulatory Staff. Provided, however, nothing herein contained shall be construed to abrogate or suspend the right of any individual or corporation not a party to maintain any action which he might otherwise have been entitled. SECTION 28. Chapter 4, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-4-160.  (A)(1) The Office of Regulatory Staff must conduct a study to evaluate the potential costs and benefits of the various administrator models for energy efficiency programs and other demand-side management programs funded by, or potentially funded by, electrical utilities in this State. This study must be conducted on each electrical utility in this State. For purposes of this section, administrator models for energy efficiency programs shall include the following models: utility administrator, state or government agency administrator, an independent third-party administrator, and a hybrid administrator. (2) For purposes of this section only, "electrical utility" means an investor-owned electrical utility that serves more than 100,000 customers in this State. (B) This study must consider which administrator model would most meaningfully improve programs offered by the electrical utility. (C) The study must also evaluate which administrator model offers the best opportunities to increase cost and energy savings, improve the quality of services rendered, reduce ratepayer costs, or more effectively serve low-income customers, within a program portfolio that is cost effective overall, as compared to similar program administration by individual electrical utilities, or to increase the cost effectiveness of energy efficiency program portfolios. This study must consider, but is not limited to, the following: (1) whether third-party administration subject to a pay for performance contract and independent third-party evaluation, measurement, and verification could reduce administrative costs, as compared to separate administration of energy efficiency programs by individual electrical utilities; (2) whether a system benefit charge or other funding or financing mechanism would more efficiently, effectively, and fairly fund energy efficiency and other demand-side management programs through an administrator; (3) which administrator model provides the best mechanism to increase ratepayer energy savings in the case of electrical utilities that have experienced lower historical performance in terms of annual and cumulative energy savings as a percentage of retail sales; (4) which administrator model provides the best mechanism to increase ratepayer energy savings in the case of electrical utilities that have experienced high historical performance in terms of annual and cumulative energy savings as a percentage of retail sales; (5) the legal and practical implications of implementing the various administrator models for an electrical utility with a multistate balancing authority area; (6) which administrator model could most enhance an electrical utility's delivery of nonenergy benefits, such as resiliency, reliability, health, economic development, industry retention, energy security, and pollution reduction; and (7) which administrator model could most effectively pursue nonratepayer funding including, but not limited to, federal, state, or local governmental support, as a means of either reducing reliance of ratepayer funds or increasing the scope, reach, or effectiveness of energy efficiency and demand-side management programs. (D) This study must be conducted with public input from stakeholders through written comments and at least one public forum. (E) The Office of Regulatory Staff is authorized to retain the services of an expert or consultant with expertise and experience in the successful implementation of energy efficiency administrator programs. The Office of Regulatory Staff is exempt from the procurement code for the purposes of retaining services for this study. (F) The provisions of this section are subject to funding. However, the Office of Regulatory Staff must initiate the study within one year from receipt of necessary funding and complete its report within six months. Upon completion of this study, the Office of Regulatory Staff must provide its report to the General Assembly and the commission. This report may include a recommendation as to which administrator model should be established for each electrical utility, draft legislation, and requirements that should be established. SECTION 29. Section 58-37-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-37-10.  As used in this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (1) "Demand-side activity" or "demand-side management program" means a program conducted or proposed by a producer, supplier, or distributor of energy for the reduction or more efficient use of energy requirements of the producer's, supplier's, or distributor's customers, through measures including, but not limited to, conservation and energy efficiency, load management, cogeneration, and renewable energy technologies. (2) "Integrated resource plan" means a plan which contains the demand and energy forecast for at least a fifteen-year period, contains the supplier's or producer's program for meeting the requirements shown in its forecast in an economic and reliable manner, including both demand-side and supply-side options, with a brief description and summary cost-benefit analysis, if available, of each option which was considered, including those not selected, sets forth the supplier's or producer's assumptions and conclusions with respect to the effect of the plan on the cost and reliability of energy service, and describes the external environmental and economic consequences of the plan to the extent practicable. For electrical utilities subject to the jurisdiction of the South Carolina Public Service Commission, this definition must be interpreted in a manner consistent with the integrated resource planning requirements pursuant to Section 58-37-40 and any process adopted by the commission. For electric cooperatives subject to the regulations of the Rural Electrification AdministrationUtilities Service, this definition must be interpreted in a manner consistent with any integrated resource planning process prescribed by Rural Electrification AdministrationUtilities Service regulations. (3) "Cost-effective" means that the net present value of benefits of a program or portfolio exceeds the net present value of the costs of the program or portfolio. A program or portfolio is cost-effective if it passes any two of the following tests: (a) utility cost test; (b) total resource cost test; (c) participant cost test; or (d) ratepayer impact measure test. In evaluating the cost-effectiveness of a program or portfolio, a utility or program administrator must present the results of all four tests. The total resource cost test must include as part of customer benefits a reasonable estimate of all significant customer cost savings. In calculating cost-effectiveness, a utility must use a standard utility practice for determining the percentage of energy savings that would or would not have been achieved through customer adoption of an efficiency behavior or technology without any incentive allowed pursuant to this chapter to install and utilize the technology as part of the associated demand-side management program. The utility must designate the expected useful life of the measure and evaluate the costs and benefits of the measures over their useful lives in the program application based on industry accepted standards. Further, in calculating the cost-effectiveness, the commission must consider the efficiencies and scale of programs that are or may be available across a utility's balancing area, even if that balancing area extends outside of the State. (4) "Demand-side management pilot program" means a demand-side management program that is of limited scope, cost, and duration and that is intended to determine whether a new or substantially revised program or technology would be cost-effective. SECTION 30. Section 58-37-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-37-20.  (A) The General Assembly declares that expanding utility investment in and customer access to cost-effective demand-side management programs will result in more efficient use of existing resources, promote lower energy costs, mitigate the increasing need for new generation and associated resources, and assist customers in managing their electricity usage to better control their electric bill, and is therefore in the public interest. (B) The commission shall approve any program filed by a public utility if the program is found to be cost-effective. Furthermore, the commission may, in its discretion, approve demand-side management pilot programs and any program filed by a public utility that is not cost-effective, so long as the proposed demand-side management program is targeted to low-income customers and the public utility's portfolio of demand-side management programs is cost-effective as a whole. (C) The South Carolina Public Service Commission maymust adopt procedures that encouragerequire electrical utilities and public utilities providing gas services subject to the jurisdiction of the commission to plan for and invest in all reasonable, prudent, and available energy efficiency and demand-side resources that are cost-effective energy efficient technologies and energy conservation programs that achieve net energy savings of at least 0.66 percent of total retail sales as of May 15, 2027, or a higher level as determined by the commission. Energy efficiency shall be considered a component of the requirement for a utility to make every reasonable effort to minimize fuel costs as outlined in Section 58-27-865(F) and the commission may grant a proportional disallowance based on evidence in record. If an electrical utility fails to meet the requirements of this section as determined by the commission, the commission is authorized to appoint a third-party administrator to carry out the residential low-income energy efficiency duties pursuant to this section on behalf of the electrical utility if the commission determines that having such a third-party administrator is in the public interest and consistent with law. Such a program shall be funded through the existing energy efficiency rider mechanism, with those funds transferred to the third-party administrator. Upon notice and hearings that the commission may require, the commission may issue rules, regulations, or orders pursuant to this chapter to implement applicable programs and measures under this section. If adopted, these procedures must: provide incentives and cost recovery for energy suppliers and distributors who invest in energy supply and end-use technologies that are cost-effective, environmentally acceptable, and reduce energy consumption or system or local coincident peak demand; allow energy suppliers and distributors to recover costs and obtain a reasonable rate of return on their investment in qualified demand-side management programs sufficient to make these programs at least as financially attractive as construction of new generating facilities; require the Public Service Commission to establish rates and charges that ensure that the net income of an electrical or gas utility regulated by the commission after implementation of specific cost-effective energy conservation measures is at least as high as the net income would have been if the energy conservation measures had not been implemented.  For purposes of this section only, the term "demand-side activity" means a program conducted by an electrical utility or public utility providing gas services for the reduction or more efficient use of energy requirements of the utility or its customers including, but not limited to, utility transmission and distribution system efficiency, customer conservation and efficiency, load management, cogeneration, and renewable energy technologies. (D) Each investor-owned electrical utility must submit an annual report to the commission describing the demand-side management programs implemented by the electrical utility in the previous year, provided the program has been operational for a reasonable period of time, as well as the results of such programs. The commission may require certain information including, but not limited to: (1) achieved savings levels from the utility's portfolio of programs in the prior year, reported as a percentage of the utility's annual sales; (2) program expenditures, including incentive payments; (3) peak demand and energy savings impacts and the techniques used to estimate those impacts; (4) avoided costs and the techniques used to estimate those costs; (5) estimated cost-effectiveness of the demand-side management programs; (6) a description of economic benefits of the demand-side management programs; (7) the number of customers eligible to opt-out of the electrical utility's demand-side management programs, the percentage of those customers that opted-out in the previous year, and the annual sales associated with those opt-out customers; and (8) any other information required by the commission. (E) To ensure prudent investments by an electrical utility in energy efficiency and demand response, as compared to potential investments in generation, transmission, distribution, and other supply related utility equipment and resources, the commission must review each investor-owned electrical utility's portfolio of demand-side management programs on at least a triennial basis to align the review of that utility's integrated resource plan pursuant to Section 58-37-40. The commission is authorized to order modifications to an electrical utility's demand-side management portfolio, including program budgets, if the commission determines that doing so in the public interest. (F) The provisions of subsections (C), (D), and (E) do not apply to an electrical utility that serves less than 100,000 customers in this State. SECTION 31. Section 58-37-30 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-37-30.  (A) The South Carolina Public Service Commission must report annually to the General Assembly on available data regarding the past, on-going, and projected status of demand-side activitiesmanagement programs and purchase of power from qualifying facilities, as defined in the Public Utilities Regulatory Policies Act of 1978, by electrical utilities and public utilities providing gas services subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission. (B) Electric cooperatives providing resale or retail services, municipally-owned electric utilities, and the South Carolina Public Service Authority shall report annually to the State Energy Office on available data regarding the past, on-going, and projected status of demand-side activitiesmanagement programs and purchase of power from qualifying facilities. For electric cooperatives, submission to the State Energy Office of a report on demand-side activitiesmanagement programs in a format complying with then current Rural Electrification AdministrationUtilities Service regulations constitutes compliance with this subsection. An electric cooperative providing resale services may submit a report in conjunction with and on behalf of any electric cooperative which purchases electric power and energy from it. The State Energy Office must compile and submit this information annually to the General Assembly. (C) The State Energy Office may provide forms for the reports required by this section to the Public Service Commission and to electric cooperatives, municipally-owned electric utilities, and the South Carolina Public Service Authority. The office shall strive to minimize differing formats for reports, taking into account the reporting requirements of other state and federal agencies. For electrical utilities and public utilities providing gas services subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, the reporting form must be in a format acceptable to the commission. SECTION 32. Chapter 37, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-37-35.  (A) An electrical utility may propose programs and customer incentives to encourage or promote demand-side management programs whereby a customer uses a customer-sited distributed energy resource, as defined in Section 58-39-120(C), or combination of such resources, to: (1) reduce the customer's electric consumption or demand from the electric grid, or (2) beneficially shape the customer's electric consumption or demand in a manner that reduces the customer's contribution to the electrical utility's system or local coincidental peak demand, subject to the associated load to utility management for reliability or economic purposes, or reduce future electrical utility system costs to serve its customers. Programs authorized pursuant to this section may also include distributed energy resources that draw additional power from the electric grid including, but not limited to, electric heat pumps with programmable or utility controlled thermostats, electric heat pump water heaters controlled through utility programs, smart home panels, advanced inverters, and energy storage devices located on the customer's side of the meter, provided that any programs or customer incentives otherwise meet the requirements of this section. These programs may also include a combination of resources, including renewable energy microgrids, to provide economic benefits to the utility system or to help address specific transmission or distribution issues that would otherwise require significant capital investment. (B) In evaluating a program or customer incentive proposed pursuant to this section to assure reasonableness, promotion of the public interest, and consistency with the objectives of Sections 58-27-845 and 58-37-20, the commission must apply the procedure approved pursuant to Section 58-37-20. An electrical utility must use standard utility practices for determining the percentage of customers that would or would not have adopted a distributed energy resource without any incentive allowed under this section to install and utilize the distributed energy resource as part of the associated demand-side management program. The electrical utility must designate the expected useful life of the distributed energy resource and evaluate the costs and benefits of demand-side measures over their useful lives in the program application based on industry-accepted standards. All initial program costs, benefits, and participation assumptions used in the electrical utility's cost-effectiveness evaluations must be reviewed by the commission to assure the electrical utility has presented a reasonable basis for its calculation. Electrical utilities must update the cost-effectiveness analysis based on the actual program costs, benefits, and participation as soon as practicably possible based on standard evaluation, measurement, and verification protocols, and the electrical utility's cost recovery must be reconciled accordingly. (C) For demand-side programs or customer incentives proposed in this section, the electrical utility may recover costs through the procedures in Section 58-37-20. The prohibition in Section 58-40-20(I) against recovery of lost revenues associated with distributed energy resources pursuant to Chapter 39, Title 58 is inapplicable to recovery of net lost revenues associated with a distributed energy resource that is installed as a result of a demand-side program incentive pursuant to this section or Section 58-37-20. (D) The commission may approve any program filed pursuant to this section if the commission finds the program to be cost effective pursuant to Section 58-37-10(3). For any demand-side programs or customer incentives submitted under this section with projected annual customer incentive amounts less than five million dollars per year for each of the first two program years, the commission must issue an order as expeditiously as practicable on the written submissions of the electrical utility but may require an evidentiary hearing where novel or complex issues of fact require special review by the commission. Nothing in this section prevents the commission from ordering an electrical utility to modify or terminate a program approved pursuant to this section based on the results of standard evaluation, measurement, and verification protocols. (E) The Energy Office must develop and publish materials intended to inform and educate the public regarding programs available to a customer pursuant to this section. The Energy Office must maintain a list of approved vendors who are qualified and in good standing to provide services associated with these programs. SECTION 33. Section 58-37-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-37-50.  (A) As used in this section: (1) "Electricity provider" means an electric cooperative, an investor-owned electric utility, the South Carolina Public Service Authority, or a municipality or municipal board or commission of public works that owns and operates an electric utility system. (2) "Natural gas provider" means an investor-owned natural gas utility or publicly owned natural gas provider. (3) "Meter conservation charge" means the charge placed on a customer's account by which electricity providers and natural gas providers recover the costs, including financing costs, of energy efficiency and conservation measures. (4) "Notice of meter conservation charge" means the written notice by which subsequent purchasers or tenants will be given notice that they will be required to pay a meter conservation charge. (5) "Customer" means a homeowner or tenant receiving electricity or natural gas as a retail customer. (6) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit eleemosynary corporation created pursuant to Chapter 45, Title 43 providing, among other things, weatherization services to a homeowner or tenant. (B) Electricity providers and natural gas providers may enter into written agreements with customers and landlords of customers for the financing of the purchase price and installation costs of energy efficiency and conservation measures. These agreements may provide that the costs must be recovered by a meter conservation charge on the customer's electricity or natural gas account, provided that the electricity providers and natural gas providers comply with the provisions of this section. A failure to pay the meter conservation charge may be treated by the electricity provider or natural gas provider as a failure to pay the electricity or natural gas account, and the electricity provider or natural gas provider may disconnect electricity or natural gas service for nonpayment of the meter conservation charge, provided the electricity provider or natural gas provider complies with the provisions of Article 25, Chapter 31, Title 5; Article 17, Chapter 11, Title 6; Article 17, Chapter 49, Title 33; Article 11, Chapter 5, Title 58; Article 21, Chapter 27, Title 58; Article 5, Chapter 31, Title 58; and any applicable rules, regulations, or ordinances relating to disconnections. (C) Any agreement permitted by subsection (B) must state plainly the interest rate to be charged to finance the costs of the energy efficiency and conservation measures. The interest rate must be a fixed rate over the term of the agreement and must not exceed four percent above the stated yield for one-year treasury bills as published by the Federal Reserve at the time the agreement is entered.on the first business day of the calendar year in which the agreement is entered. An electrical utility entering into such an agreement whose rates are regulated by the commission must fix the interest rate over the term of the agreement to not exceed such utility's weighted average cost of equity and long-term debt as most recently approved by the commission at the time the agreement is entered. Any indebtedness created under the provisions of this section may be paid in full at any time before it is due without penalty. (D) An electricity provider or natural gas provider may recover the costs, including financing costs, of these measures from its members or customers directly benefiting from the installation of the energy efficiency and conservation measures. Recovery may be through a meter conservation charge to the account of the member or customer and any such charge must be shown by a separate line item on the account. A utility entering into such agreement whose rates are regulated by the commission shall recover all reasonable and prudent incremental costs incurred to implement agreements for financing and installing energy-efficiency and conservation measures in base rates. Incremental costs may include, but are not limited to, billing system upgrades, overhead, incremental labor, and all other expenses properly considered to be associated with ensuring the ongoing premise bill savings are realized from offering during the terms of such agreements. (E) An electricity provider or natural gas provider shall assume no liability for the installation, operation, or maintenance of energy efficiency and conservation measures when the measures are performed by a third party, and shall not provide any warranty as to the merchantability of the measures or the fitness for a particular purpose of the measures, and no action may be maintained against the electricity provider or natural gas provider relating to the failure of the measures. An electricity provider or natural gas provider shall assume no liability for energy audits performed by third parties and shall provide no warranty relating to any energy audit done by any third party. Nothing in this section may be construed to limit any rights or remedies of utility customers and landlords of utility customers against other parties to a transaction involving the purchase and installation of energy efficiency and conservation measures. (F) Before entering into an agreement contemplated by this section, the electricity provider or natural gas provider shall cause to be performed an energy audit on the residence considered for the energy efficiency measures. The energy audit must be conducted by an energy auditor certified by the Building Performance Institute or similar organization. The audit must provide an estimate of the costs of the proposed energy efficiency and conservation measures and the expected savings associated with the measures, and it must recommend measures appropriately sized for the specific use contemplated. An agreement entered following completion of an energy audit shall specify the measures to be completed and the contractor responsible for completion of the measures. The choice of a contractor to perform the work must be made by the owner of the residence. Upon request, the electricity provider or natural gas provider must provide the owner of the residence with a list of contractors qualified to do the work. Upon completion of the work, it must be inspected by an energy auditor certified by the Building Performance Institute or similar organization. Any work that is determined to have been done improperly or to be inappropriately sized for the intended use must be remedied by the responsible contractor. Until the work has been remedied, funds due to the contractor must be held in escrow by the electricity provider or natural gas provider. (G) An electricity provider or natural gas provider that enters into an agreement as provided in this section may recover the costs, including financing costs, of energy efficiency and conservation measures from subsequent purchasers of the residence in which the measures are installed, provided the electricity provider or natural gas provider gives record notice that the residence is subject to the agreement. Notice must be given, at the expense of the filer, by filing a notice of meter conservation charge with the appropriate office for the county in which the residence is located, pursuant to Section 30-5-10. The notice of meter conservation charge does not constitute a lien on the property but is intended to give a purchaser of the residence notice that the residence is subject to a meter conservation charge. Notice is deemed to have been given if a search of the property records of the county discloses the existence of the charge and informs a prospective purchaser: (1) how to ascertain the amount of the charge and the length of time it is expected to remain in effect, and (2) of his obligation to notify a tenant if the purchaser leases the property as provided in subsection (H)(3). (H) An electricity provider or natural gas provider may enter into agreements for the installation of energy efficiency and conservation measures and the recovery of the costs, including financing costs, of the measures with respect to rental properties by filing a notice of meter conservation charge as provided in subsection (G) and by complying with the provisions of this subsection: (1) The energy audit required by subsection (F) must be conducted and the results provided to both the landlord and the tenant living in the rental property at the time the agreement is entered. (2) If both the landlord and tenant agree, the electricity provider or natural gas provider may recover the costs of the energy efficiency and conservation measures, including financing costs, through a meter conservation charge on the account associated with the rental property occupied by the tenant. The agreement must provide notice to the landlord of the provisions contained in item (3). (3) With respect to a subsequent tenant occupying a rental unit benefiting from the installation of energy efficiency and conservation measures, the electricity provider or natural gas provider may continue to recover the costs, including financing costs, of the measures through a meter conservation charge on the account associated with the rental property occupied by the tenant. With respect to a subsequent tenant, the landlord must give a written notice of meter conservation charge in the same manner as required by Section 27-40-240. If the landlord fails to give the subsequent tenant the required notice of meter conservation charge, the tenant may deduct from his rent, for no more than one-half of the term of the rental agreement, the amount of the meter conservation charge paid to the electricity provider or natural gas provider. (I) Agreements entered pursuant to the provisions of this section are exempt from the provisions of the South Carolina Consumer Protection Code, Title 37 of the South Carolina Code of Laws. (J) An electricity provider or natural gas provider may contract with third parties to perform functions permitted under this section, including the financing of the costs of energy efficiency and conservation measures. A third party must comply with all applicable provisions of this section. When an electricity or natural gas provider contracts with a third party to perform administrative or financing functions under this subsection, the liability of the third party is limited in the same manner as an electricity provider or natural gas provider is under subsection (E). (K) The provisions of this section apply only to energy efficiency and conservation measures for a residence already occupied atbefore the time the measures are taken. The procedures allowed by this section may not be used with respect to a new residence or a residence under construction. The provisions of this section may not be used to implement energy efficiency or conservation measures that result in the replacement of natural gas appliances or equipment with electric appliances or equipment, or that result in the replacement of electric appliances or equipment with natural gas appliances or equipment, unless (1) the customer who seeks to install the energy efficiency or conservation measure is being provided electric and natural gas service by the same provider, or (2) an electric appliance used for home heating is being replaced by an appliance that operates primarily on electricity but which has the capability of also operating on a secondary fuel source. (L) Electricity providers or natural gas providers may offer their customers other types of financing agreements available by law, instead of the option established in this section, for the types of energy efficiency or conservation measures described in this section. (M)(1) An electricity provider or natural gas provider must not obtain funding from the following federal programs to provide loans provided by this section: (a) the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), created by Title XXVI of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 and codified as Chapter 94, Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended by the Human Services Reauthorization Act of 1984, the Human Services Reauthorization Act of 1986, the Augustus F. Hawkins Human Services Reauthorization Act of 1990, the National Institutes of Health Revitalization Act of 1993, the Low Income Home Energy Amendments of 1994, the Coats Human Services Reauthorization Act of 1998, and the Energy Policy Act of 2005 which is administered and funded by the United States Department of Health and Human Services on the federal level and administered locally by community action agencies; (b) the Weatherization Assistance Program, created by Title IV of the Energy Conservation and Production Act of 1976 and codified as Part A, Subchapter III, Chapter 81, Title 42 of the United States Code, amended by the National Energy Conservation Policy Act, the Energy Security Act, the Human Services Reauthorization Act of 1984, and the State Energy Efficiency Programs Improvement Act of 1990 and administered and funded by the United States Department of Energy on the federal level and administered locally by community action agencies. (2) Nothing in this section changes the exclusive administration of these programs by local community action agencies through the South Carolina Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity pursuant to its authority pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 45, Title 43, the Community Economic Opportunity Act of 1983. (3) Nothing in this subsection prevents a customer or member of an electricity provider or natural gas provider from obtaining services under the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program or the Weatherization Assistance Program. SECTION 34.A Section 58-3-70 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-3-70. The chairman and members of the commission shall receive annual salaries payable in the same manner as the salaries of other state officers are paid. The commission members shall receive a salary in an amount equal to ninety percent of the salary fixed for Associate Justices of the Supreme Court of South Carolina. Each commissioner must devote full time to his duties as a commissioner and must not engage in any other employment, business, profession, or vocation during the normal business hours of the commission. B. This section is effective beginning with the fiscal year immediately following the next Public Service Commission election after the effective date of this act. SECTION 35. Chapter 41, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-41-50.  (A) The General Assembly encourages electrical utilities to explore cost effective, efficient bulk power solutions, particularly during periods of constrained capacity, for nonresidential customers with electric loads in excess of 25 megawatts. (B)(1) An electrical utility may file a proposed agreement regarding co-located resources between the utility and a customer or multiple customers with an electric load in excess of 25 megawatts for the commission's consideration. The proposed agreement must contain at least one of the following requirements: (a) co-location of electric generation or storage on the customer's property provides bulk system benefits for all customers and benefits for the host customer; (b) co-location of renewable electric generation resources on the customer's property provides bulk system benefits for all customers and the renewable attributes associated with such generation can be allocated to the host customer; (c) co-location of electric generation on the customer's property would result in permitting and siting efficiencies to enable electric generation to come online earlier than otherwise could occur; or (d) co-location of electric generation resources on the customer's property could be utilized as resiliency resources to serve the electric grid in times of need. (2) In the filing with the commission, the electrical utility must include a description of: (a) credit and ratepayer protections included in the agreement; (b) the contractual terms that preserves the electrical utility's operation of resources; and (c) how costs and benefits associated with the agreement would be allocated among the customer who is a party to the agreement and other customers in the electrical utility's balancing area. (C) The commission must give a proposed agreement filed pursuant to this section expedited consideration. The commission may approve the proposed agreement if the commission finds: (1) the proposed program was voluntarily agreed upon by the electrical utility and the customer or multiple customers; (2) the filing meets the requirements of this section; and (3) the proposed agreement is in the public interest. (D) For purposes of this section, "co-located" or "co-location" includes electric generation, storage, renewables, and associated facilities on a customer's site as well as any location where the connection to the electrical utility enables resilient power supply to support the development of power supply to meet the customer's needs. An agreement regarding co-location may also include potential co-ownership of the electric generation and associate facilities by the electrical utility and the customer. A customer participating in a co-location or co-ownership agreement shall not be considered an electrical utility. (E) Notwithstanding opportunities for co-located resources, the General Assembly also encourages electrical utilities to continue to facilitate service to new electric loads in excess of 50 megawatts and to require operational and financial performance requirements for such customers to receive service pursuant to tariffed electrical utility rates or contracts approved by the commission, and to ensure appropriate protections and risk mitigation for the protection of the electrical utility's existing customers. The electrical utility may meet these objectives by: (1) filing form contracts with the commission; (2) tariff offerings or services regulations filed with the commission; or (3) performance and credit policies reviewed by the Office of Regulatory Staff. SECTION 36. (A) To foster economic development and future jobs in this State resulting from the supply chains associated with the same while supporting the significant and growing energy and capacity needs of the State, enhance grid resiliency, and maintain reliability, the General Assembly finds that the State of South Carolina should take steps necessary to encourage the development of a diverse mix of long-lead, clean generation resources that may include nuclear and advanced nuclear, biomass as defined in Section 12-63-20(B)(2) of the S.C. Code, hydrogen-capable resources, fusion energy, and other technologies, and should preserve the option of efficiency development of such long-lead resources with timely actions to establish or maintain eligibility for or capture available tax or other financial incentives or address operational needs. (B) For an electrical utility to capture available tax or other financial or operational incentives for South Carolina ratepayers in a timely manner, the commission may find that actions by an electrical utility in pursuit of the directives in Section 58-37-35(A) are in the public interest, provided that the commission determines that such proposed actions are in the public interest and reasonably balance economic development and industry retention benefits, capacity expansion benefits, resource adequacy and diversification and potential risks, costs, and benefits to ratepayers and otherwise comply with all other legal requirements applicable to the electrical utility's proposed action. For the South Carolina Public Service Authority, the Office of Regulatory Staff and the Public Service Authority's board of directors shall apply the same principles described in this subsection in evaluating and approving actions proposed by the management of the Public Service Authority to achieve the objectives of this section. SECTION 37. All reasonable and prudent costs incurred by an electrical utility necessary to effectuate this act, that are not precluded from recovery by other provisions of this act and that do not have a recovery mechanism otherwise specified in this act or established by state law, shall be deferred for commission consideration of recovery in any proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 58-27-870, and allowed for recovery if the commission determines the costs are reasonable and prudent. SECTION 38. Section 58-40-10(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) "Renewable energy resource" means solar photovoltaic and solar thermal resources, wind resources, hydroelectric resources, geothermal resources, tidal and wave energy resources, recycling resources, hydrogen fuel derived from renewable resources, combined heat and power derived from renewable resources, and biomass resources as defined in Section 12-63-20(B)(2). SECTION 39.A. The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that: (1) the economic and financial well-being of South Carolina and its citizens depends upon continued economic development and industry retention and opportunities for job attraction and retention; and (2) the cost of electricity and the availability of clean energy sources for electricity are important factors in the decision for a commercial and industrial entity to locate, expand, or maintain their existing establishments in South Carolina; and (3) competitive electric rates, terms, and conditions and the ability to utilize clean energy sources for electric power generation are necessary to attract prospective commercial or industrial entities to invest in South Carolina and to encourage and incent robust economic development growth and industry retention in this State; and (4) electrical utilities are critical economic development and industry retention partners for South Carolina by offering affordable power that has helped to attract jobs and associated development. B. Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-43-10.  Unless otherwise specified, for purposes of this chapter: (1) "Commission" means the Public Service Commission. (2) "Contract" has the same meaning as the term is used in Section 58-27-980. (3) "Electrical utility" has the same meaning as provided in Section 58-27-10(7). (4) "Marginal cost" means the electrical utility's marginal cost for producing energy. (5) "Qualifying customer" means either: (a) an existing commercial or industrial customer with a combined firm and interruptible contract demand greater than 20 megawatts that agrees to a new or extended electric service contract with a term of five years or more; or (b) a commercial or industrial customer that agrees to locate its operations in South Carolina or expand its existing establishment, and such location or expansion results in the minimum of: (i) 500 kilowatts at one point of delivery; (ii) fifty new employees; and (iii) capital investment of $400,000 following the electrical utility's approval for service. (6) "Rate proposal" means a written document that identifies the rates, terms, and conditions for electric service offered by an electrical utility to a prospective customer. (7) "Renewable energy facility" means a solar array or other facility constructed by or on behalf of a qualifying customer for the exclusive purpose of supplementing electrical power generation from a renewable energy source for its economic development location, expansion, or retention. (8) "Transformational customer" means a commercial or industrial customer that agrees to locate its operations in South Carolina or expand its existing establishment, and such location or expansion results in the addition of a minimum of: (a) 50 megawatts at one point of delivery; (b) 500 new employees; (c) capital investment of $100,000,000 following the electrical utility's approval for service; and (d) who is designated by the South Carolina Department of Commerce as a business which will bring substantial benefit to the economy of South Carolina and its citizens, such that it is in the public interest to have such transformational customer located in this State. Section 58-43-20.  (A) When considering whether the rates, terms, and conditions negotiated with economic development prospects are just and reasonable, the commission shall give full weight and consideration to the economic development benefits to the electrical utility's customers that result from prospective commercial or industrial entities locating or expanding their activities in South Carolina. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an electrical utility may provide the South Carolina Department of Commerce or a prospective qualifying customer or transformational customer with a rate proposal containing terms and conditions to incentivize the prospective customer to make capital investments and employ additional workforce in the electrical utility's service territory. The rate proposal initially provided by an electrical utility may differ from the final contract, rate, terms, and conditions with the qualifying customer or transformational customer. (C) An electrical utility may offer special rates, terms, and conditions to a qualifying customer or transformational customer, including rates that are lower than the rates the customer otherwise would be charged. The agreement with the customer must be for a term not exceeding ten years and the electrical utility may offer the customer interruptible and real-time pricing options and riders for other clean energy attributes which may support the qualifying customer's or transformational customer's needs. However, rates for qualifying customers may not be lower than the electrical utility's marginal cost of providing service to the customer and rates for transformational customers may not be lower than twenty-five percent less than the electrical utility's marginal cost of providing service to the customer. (D) Rates, terms, and conditions negotiated with qualifying and transformational customers shall be deemed just and reasonable if: (1) for qualifying customers, the terms of this section are met; (2) for transformational customers, the commission determines that: (a) the economic development rate offered significantly impacts the customer's decision to locate or expand in South Carolina; (b) the financial value realized by the electrical utility's system from the transformational customer being on the electrical utility's system for ten years is greater than or equal to the financial value of the rate incentive given to the transformational customer; (c) measures have been taken to avoid or reduce cross-customer class-subsidization; and (d) the consequences of offering the economic development rate are beneficial to the system as a whole considering all customer classes. The commission must either approve or deny an application pursuant to this section within sixty days. (E) Nothing in this chapter shall otherwise restrict the commission's authority to regulate rates and charges or review contracts entered into pursuant to this section or to otherwise supervise the operations of electrical utilities. (F) The construction of a proposed renewable energy facility by or on behalf of a qualifying customer to support electric power generation at its location must comply with federal, state, and local laws and ordinances. (G) Consistent with federal, state, and local laws and ordinances, the electrical utility may expedite interconnection of a proposed renewable energy facility to be constructed by a qualifying or transformational customer to support electrical power generation at its location where high-quality and reliable electric service are not adversely impacted. (H) In the event a qualifying customer or transformational customer leaves this State or terminates its operations in this State during the ten-year contract period, such customer must reimburse the electrical utility and its customers the difference between standard rates and the rates paid during the term of the agreement between the electrical utility and its customers. (I) An electrical utility shall not be required to adjust its cost of service in a rate proceeding as a result of a rate, agreement, or infrastructure provided pursuant to this section in any matter that would impute revenue at a level higher than received by the electrical utility from a qualifying customer or transformational customer or would otherwise reduce the electrical utility's revenue as a result of entering into contracts with qualifying customers or transformational customers pursuant to this section. (J) If an electrical utility offers special rates, terms, and conditions to a qualifying customer or a transformational customer, any electrical utility in South Carolina may also offer all directly competing existing customers in its service territory in this State with similar special rates, terms, and conditions at the time the agreement is entered into with the qualifying customer or transformational customer to the extent the directly competing existing customer is able to substantiate its status as a directly competing existing customer. For purposes of this section, customers are "directly competing" if they make the same end-product, or offer the same service, for the same general group of customers. Customers that only produce component parts of the same end-product are not directly competing customers. SECTION 40. Chapter 37, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-37-135. Any appeal of an order concerning a permit for an energy infrastructure project which appeal is not finally resolved on the effective date of this statute shall be immediately transferred to the South Carolina Supreme Court which shall have the exclusive jurisdiction of all proceedings related to that appeal. SECTION 41. Section 58-3-530 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (16) to conduct an annual evaluation of the performance of the Division of Consumer Advocacy within the Department of Consumer Affairs related to the division's representation of consumers in utility matters, which must be submitted to the General Assembly. A proposed draft of the evaluation must be submitted to the Division of Consumer Advocacy prior to submission to the General Assembly, and the Division of Consumer Advocacy must be given an opportunity to be heard before the review committee prior to the completion of the evaluation and its submission to the General Assembly. SECTION 42. Chapter 13, Title 8 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 8-13-65. Beginning with Fiscal Year 2025-2026, the salary for the commission's chief clerk must be based on recommendations by the Agency Head Salary Commission to the General Assembly as provided in Sections 8-11-160 and 8-11-165. SECTION 43. Chapter 33, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-33-200. For any construction project with a project budget of at least five hundred million dollars and in order to maintain the financial integrity of significant expenditures affecting ratepayers, the Office of Regulatory Staff shall retain an independent construction analyst who shall monitor the construction project on a regular basis and who shall provide to the Office of Regulatory Staff, the Public Service Commission, the Public Utilities Review Committee, and the Joint Bond Review Committee regular reports as to the status of the construction efforts as needed, but at least on a quarterly basis. SECTION 44. Chapter 27, Title 58 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 58-27-835. (A) For purposes of this section only: (1) "Commercial data center" means a facility, campus of facilities, or array of interconnected facilities in this State used by an entity or other business enterprise to operate, manage, or maintain a computer, group of computers, or other organized assembly of hardware and software for the primary purpose of storing, retrieving, or transmitting data and that has a peak demand of one hundred megawatts or greater. (2) "Electric service provider" means an electrical utility, consolidated political subdivisions, electric cooperatives, and the Public Service Authority. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an electric service provider shall require additional terms and conditions of electric service, including, without limitation, rates, charges, minimum billing requirements, and longer terms of contract, designed to ensure all costs associated with serving or preparing to serve commercial data centers are recovered solely, or at least substantially, from commercial data centers. These terms and conditions shall include, at a minimum: (1) a contract term of at least fifteen years; (2) minimum billing requirements; (3) a requirement that the commercial data center, upon termination of its contract for electric service, pay any unrecovered costs incurred in serving or preparing to serve the commercial data center, including, but not limited to, distribution, transmission, and generation costs associated with the provision of electric service to the commercial data center; (4) collateral from the commercial data center to be paid to the electric service provider in the event the commercial data center terminates its contract prior to the contract expiration date. The electric service provider must maintain this collateral in a separate account. In the event the account earns any interest, that interest amount must be applied towards the commercial data center's outstanding costs, less any administrative fees the electric service provider may have incurred due to the account; and (5) a requirement that the commercial data center, upon termination of its contract for electric service, pay any unrecovered costs incurred in serving or preparing to serve the commercial data center to the electric service provider. This must include, but not be limited to, distribution, transmission, and generation costs associated with the provision of electric service to the commercial data center. (C) Any contract pursuant to this section must be approved by the Public Service Commission. Before the commission may approve a contract, it must determine that the contract meets the requirements of this section and that costs associated with increased fuel requirements, generation costs, and transmission costs that: (i) are substantially related to the provision of electric services to the commercial data center; and (ii) would not have been incurred but for the electric demand of such commercial data center, shall be recovered solely by the electric service provider from the commercial data center. (D) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a commercial data center that is a customer of an electric service provider in this State as of May 15, 2025. SECTION 45.A. Section 12-36-2120(65) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (65)(a) computer equipment, as defined in subitem (c) of this item, used in connection with a technology intensive facility as defined in Section 12-6-3360(M)(14)(b), where: (i) the taxpayer invests at least three hundred million dollars in real or personal property or both comprising or located at the facility over a five-year period; (ii) the taxpayer creates at least one hundred new full-time jobs at the facility during that five-year period, and the average cash compensation of at least one hundred of the new full-time jobs is one hundred fifty percent of the per capita income of the State according to the most recently published data available at the time the facility's construction starts; and (iii) at least sixty percent of the three hundred million dollars minimum investment consists of computer equipment; and (iv) the taxpayer enters into a fee in lieu agreement on or before May 15, 2025, and any subsequent renewal of that agreement. (b) computer equipment, as defined in subitem (c) of this item, used in connection with a manufacturing facility, where: (i) the taxpayer invests at least seven hundred fifty million dollars in real or personal property or both comprising or located at the facility over a seven-year period;  and (ii) the taxpayer creates at least three thousand eight hundred full-time new jobs at the facility during that seven-year period. As used in this subitem, "taxpayer" includes a person who bears a relationship to the taxpayer as described in Section 267(b) of the Internal Revenue Code. (c) For the purposes of this item, "computer equipment" means original or replacement servers, routers, switches, power units, network devices, hard drives, processors, memory modules, motherboards, racks, other computer hardware and components, cabling, cooling apparatus, and related or ancillary equipment, machinery, and components, the primary purpose of which is to store, retrieve, aggregate, search, organize, process, analyze, or transfer data or any combination of these, or to support related computer engineering or computer science research. (d) These exemptions apply from the start of the investment in or construction of the technology intensive facility or the manufacturing facility. The taxpayer shall notify the Department of Revenue of its use of the exemption provided in this item on or before the first sales tax return filed with the department after the first such use. Upon receipt of the notification, the department shall issue an appropriate exemption certificate to the taxpayer to be used for qualifying purposes under this item. Within six months after the fifth anniversary of the taxpayer's first use of this exemption, the taxpayer shall notify the department in writing that it has or has not met the investment and job requirements of this item by the end of that five-year period. Once the department certifies that the taxpayer has met the investment and job requirements, all subsequent purchases of or investments in computer equipment, including to replace originally deployed computer equipment or to implement future expansions, likewise shall qualify for the exemption described above, regardless of when the taxpayer makes the investments. (e) The department may assess any tax due on property purchased tax free pursuant to this item but due the State if the taxpayer subsequently fails timely to meet the investment and job requirements of this item after being granted the exemption;  for purposes of determining whether the taxpayer has timely satisfied the investment requirement, replacement computer equipment counts toward the investment requirement to the extent that the value of the replacement computer equipment exceeds the cost of the computer equipment so replaced, but, provided the taxpayer otherwise qualifies for the exemption, the full value of the replacement computer equipment is exempt from sales and use tax. The running of the periods of limitation within which the department may assess taxes provided pursuant to Section 12-54-85 is suspended during the time period beginning with the taxpayer's first use of this exemption and ending with the later of the fifth anniversary of first use or notice to the department that the taxpayer either has met or has not met the investment and job requirements of this item; B. Section 12-36-2120(66) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (66) electricity used by a technology intensive facility as defined in Section 12-6-3360(M)(14)(b) and qualifying, on or before May 15, 2025, for the sales tax exemption provided pursuant to item (65) of this section, and the equipment and raw materials including, without limitation, fuel used by such qualifying facility to generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity for use in such a facility. The running of the periods of limitation within which the department may assess taxes pursuant to Section 12-54-85 is suspended during the same time period it is suspended in item (65)(d) of this section; C. Section 12-36-2120(79) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (79)(A)(1) original or replacement computers, computer equipment, and computer hardware and software purchases used within a datacenter;  and (2) electricity used by a datacenter and eligible business property to be located and used at the datacenter. This subsubitem does not apply to sales of electricity for any other purpose, and such sales are subject to the tax, including, but not limited to, electricity used in administrative offices, supervisory offices, parking lots, storage warehouses, maintenance shops, safety control, comfort air conditioning, elevators used in carrying personnel, cafeterias, canteens, first aid rooms, supply rooms, water coolers, drink boxes, unit heaters and waste house lights. (B) As used in this section: (1) "Computer" means an electronic device that accepts information in digital or similar form and manipulates it for a result based on a sequence of instructions. (2) "Computer equipment" means original or replacement servers, routers, switches, power units, network devices, hard drives, processors, memory modules, motherboards, racks, other computer hardware and components, cabling, cooling apparatus, and related or ancillary equipment, machinery, and components, the primary purpose of which is to store, retrieve, aggregate, search, organize, process, analyze, or transfer data or any combination of these, or to support related computer engineering or computer science research. This also includes equipment cooling systems for managing the performance of the datacenter property, including mechanical and electrical equipment, hardware for distributed and mainframe computers and servers, data storage devices, network connectivity equipment, and peripheral components and systems. (3) "Computer software" means a set of coded instructions designed to cause a computer or automatic data processing equipment to perform a task. (4) "Concurrently maintainable" means capable of having any capacity component or distribution element serviced or repaired on a planned basis without interrupting or impeding the performance of the computer equipment. (5) "Datacenter" means a new or existing facility at a single location in South Carolina: (i) that provides infrastructure for hosting or data processing services and that has power and cooling systems that are created and maintained to be concurrently maintainable and to include redundant capacity components and multiple distribution paths serving the computer equipment at the facility. Although the facility must have multiple distribution paths serving the computer equipment, a single distribution path may serve the computer equipment at any one time; (ii)(a) where a taxpayer invests at least fifty million dollars in real or personal property or both over a five year period;  or (b) where one or more taxpayers invests a minimum aggregate capital investment of at least seventy-five million dollars in real or personal property or both over a five year period; (iii) where a taxpayer creates and maintains at least twenty-five full-time jobs at the facility with an average cash compensation level of one hundred fifty percent of the per capita income of the State or of the county in which the facility is located, whichever is lower, according to the most recently published data available at the time the facility is certified by the Department of Commerce; (iv) where the jobs created pursuant to subitem (B)(5)(iii) are maintained for three consecutive years after a facility with the minimum capital investment and number of jobs has been certified by the Department of Commerce;  and (v) which is certified by the Department of Commerce pursuant to subitem (D)(1) under such policies and procedures as promulgated by the Department of Commerce. (6) "Eligible business property" means property used for the generation, transformation, transmission, distribution, or management of electricity, including exterior substations and other business personal property used for these purposes. (7) "Multiple distribution paths" means a series of distribution paths configured to ensure that failure on one distribution path does not interrupt or impede other distribution paths. (8) "Redundant capacity components" means components beyond those required to support the computer equipment. (C)(1) To qualify for the exemption allowed by this item, a taxpayer, and the facility in the case of a seventy-five million dollar investment made by more than one taxpayer, shall, on or before May 15, 2025, notify the Department of Revenue and Department of Commerce, in writing, of its intention to claim the exemption. For purposes of meeting the requirements of subitems (B)(5)(ii) and (B)(5)(iii) , capital investment and job creation begin accruing once the taxpayer notifies each department. Also, the five-year period begins upon notification. (2) Once the taxpayer meets the requirements of subitem (B)(5), or at the end of the five-year period, the taxpayer shall notify the Department of Revenue, in writing, whether it has or has not met the requirements of subitem (B)(5). The taxpayer shall provide the proof the department determines necessary to determine that the requirements have been met. (D)(1) Upon notifying each department of its intention to claim the exemption pursuant to subitem (C)(1), and upon certification by the Department of Commerce, the taxpayer may claim the exemption on eligible purchases at any time during the period provided in Section 12-54-85(F), including the time period prior to subitem (B)(5)(iv) being satisfied. (2) For purposes of this section, the running of the periods of limitations for assessment of taxes provided in Section 12-54-85 is suspended for: (i) the time period beginning with notice to each department pursuant to subitem (C)(1) and ending with notice to the Department of Revenue pursuant to subitem (C)(2);  and (ii) during the three year job maintenance requirement pursuant to subitem (B)(5)(iv). (E) Any subsequent purchase of or investment in computer equipment, computer hardware and software, and computers, including to replace originally deployed computer equipment or to implement future expansions, likewise shall qualify for the exemption provided in this subitem, regardless of when the taxpayer makes the investments. (F)(1) If a taxpayer receives the exemption for purchases but fails to meet the requirements of subitem (B)(5) at the end of the five-year period, the department may assess any state or local sales or use tax due on items purchased. (2) If a taxpayer meets the requirements of subitem (B)(5), but subsequently fails to maintain the number of full-time jobs with the required compensation level at the facility, as previously required pursuant to subitem (B)(5)(iii), the taxpayer is: (i) not allowed the exemption for items described in subitem (A)(1) until the taxpayer meets the previous qualifying jobs requirements pursuant to subitem (B)(5)(iii);  and (ii) allowed the exemption for electricity pursuant to subitem (A)(2), but the exemption only applies to a percentage of the sale price, calculated by dividing the number of qualifying jobs by twenty-five. (G) This subitem only applies to a datacenter that is certified by the Department of Commerce pursuant to subitem (D)(1) prior to January 1, 2032 May 15, 2030. However, this item shall continue to apply to a taxpayer that is certified by December 31, 2031May 14, 2030, for an additional ten year period. Upon the end of the ten year period, this subitem is repealed; SECTION 46. (A) Five years after the effective date of this act, the Office of the Regulatory Staff shall prepare a report, to be filed with the Public Utilities Review Committee and the General Assembly, to address the implementation of Article 24, Chapter 27, Title 58 as it relates to the following areas: (1) assessing the functioning of the procedures established by section with recommendation for any changes required to ensure their efficient functioning, to promote regulatory efficiency, and to make further the establishment of just, reasonable, and fair rates; (2) assessing the effect of rates on ratepayers of all classes; (3) assessing the reliability of the electric system and whether investments made by electric utilities increased reliability compared to any change in electric utility rates experienced by ratepayers within the same timeframe; and (4) any other information requested by the General Assembly to be included within the report. (B) The Office of Regulatory Staff may engage a qualified, independent third party to assist in preparation of the report. (C) All expenses and charges incurred by the Office of Regulatory Staff in the performance of its duties within this section may be defrayed by assessments made by the Comptroller General against the regulated electrical utilities regulated and based upon twenty five percent of the gross revenues collected by such electrical utilities from their business done wholly within this State in the manner set out in Section 58-4-60 for other corporations. SECTION 47. Upon passage of this act, Dominion Energy shall evaluate the process for converting the Wateree Generating Station from coal-fired generation to biomass-fired generation. Biomass-fired generation includes, but is not limited to, generation from the firing of wood pellets and wood chips. Dominion Energy must make a report concerning the conversion process to the Public Service Commission and General Assembly by no later than January 13, 2026. SECTION 48. The General Assembly finds that the sections presented in this act constitute one subject as required by Article III, Section 17 of the South Carolina Constitution, in particular finding that each change and each topic relates directly to or in conjunction with other sections to the subject of regulation of electrical utilities, the provision of electricity, and economic development as clearly enumerated in the title. The General Assembly further finds that a common purpose or relationship exists among the sections, representing a potential plurality but not disunity of topics, notwithstanding that reasonable minds might differ in identifying more than one topic contained in the act. SECTION 49. If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 50. This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----